 We have four month old mice that were diabetic and now are not.
 The study is still in its early stages, as Dr Ehud Ur, professor of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and director of the clinical and scientific Department of the Canadian Diabetes Association,
 Like other experts, he is sceptical about the possibility of curing diabetes, pointing out that these results are of no relevance to people who are already affected by type 1 diabetes.
 The Secretary of the Swedish Academy, Sara Danius, announced on Monday that the Academy had been unable to contact Bob Dylan,
 Danius has disclosed, I have telephoned and emailed his closest collaborator, who has answered me in a very polite way.
 In the past, Jamie Siminoff, the company's Ceo, has pointed out that the company was born when it couldn't even hear the doorbell from its garage shop.
 He has said he built a Wi-Fi Bell.
 Siminoff has said that sales increased after his appearance in 2013 on the show Shark Tank,
 Siminoff appeared on the commercial television network Qvc at the end of 2017.
 Ring has also reached a transitional agreement with the company's competitor, the ADT Corporation.
 On the one hand, it seems that there is a vaccine in the making that can reduce the mortality from Ebola,
 A cocktail of antibodies, ZMapp, has initially shown promise in the field, but formal studies have revealed an efficacy lower than that hoped for in the prevention of deaths.
 In the PALM study, ZMapp was used as a control, meaning that scientists used it as a reference and compared it to the other three therapies.
 The USA Gymnastics board of directors,
 We agree with the USOC that the best interests of our athletes and our clubs, and the best interests of their sport, can be better served by moving forward with a meaningful change within our organization,
 USA Gymnastics has commissioned an independent investigation to understand how such abuse as described by so many survivors of Larry Nassar could have been so pervasive for so long,
 USA Gymnastics and the U S . Olympic Committee have the same goal,
 In the course of the nineteen sixty s, Brzezinski was the advisor to John F . Kennedy and then to the administration of Lyndon B . Johnson.
 In the course of the 1976 elections, he advised Carter on foreign policy,
 In his role as a member of the National security Council,
 The film, starring Ryan Gosling and Emma stone, has received nominations in all the major categories.
 Gosling and the stone had the nomination for best actor and best actress respectively.
 The other nominations include best picture, best director, best photography, best costume, best editing, best original score, best art direction, best sound editing, best sound mixing, and best original screenplay.
 Two songs from the film, Audition and City of Stars, were nominated for best original song.
 On Sunday evening, the President of the United States, Donald Trump,
 The announcement was made following a phone call between Trump and Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 Turkey, the statement said, would also take over the custody of ISIS fighters who are being held in detention centers in Europe,
 This not only confirms that some dinosaurs had feathers, a theory that's been widely accepted, but it provides more details than the fossils,
 According to scientists, the plumage of this animal was Brownish-Red on the upper part, with a pale or carotenoid coloration on the lower part.
 The discovery also allows for detailed information to be obtained about the evolution of birds' feathers.
 Because the dinosaur's plumage did not have the basic structure of a rachis, but instead had other characteristics, such as barbs and barbels,
 The structure of the feathers suggests that it was not used for flight, but rather for temperature regulation or courtship.
 Secondly, the tail, although belonging to a young dinosaur,
 An explosive device was detonated yesterday morning at the police headquarters in Gaziantep, Turkey, killing two officers and wounding over twenty people.
 The governor's office has reported that among the injured, nineteen were police officers.
 The police have reported that the suspect responsible for the attack is a presumed Daesh militant.
 They found that the sun's operation is based on the same basic principles as that of all the other stars the activity of all the stars in the solar system is determined by nothing else but their luminosity and their rotation.
 Luminosity is used in conjunction with rotation to define a star's number of Rossby, which is linked to the flow of plasma.
 The lower the number of Rossby, the less the star is active in relation to magnetic inversions.
 During his journey, Iwasaki got into trouble on several occasions.
 He was robbed by pirates, attacked by a rabid dog in Tibet, escaped from a forced marriage in Nepal, and was arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard can operate in both the 2.4 GHz and 5.0 GHz bands.
 If the base station has dual radios, this will allow it to be backward compatible with 802.11a, 802.11b, and 802.11g.
 The speeds of 802.11n are considerably higher than those of the previous versions, with a theoretical maximum throughput of 600 Mbps.
 Duvall, who is married with two adult children, did not arouse much interest in Miller, who told the story.
 When asked for a comment, Miller responded, quote, I was preparing for this, so I was not listening to what he was saying.
 We will strive to cut carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP by a significant margin by 2020, compared to the levels of 2005.
 It has not set a precise value for the reduction, stating that it will depend on Chinese economic productivity.
 Hu has invited developing countries to avoid the old path of polluting first and cleaning up later.
 And he also said that they should not be forced to assume obligations that go beyond their stage of development,
 The Iraq inquiry has published its report at 12.00 GMT.
 He warned, no action in Iraq at this time can guarantee that any action in Iraq at this time will stop sectarian violence,
 The report begins with a call for an open debate and for consensus in the United States about the Middle East.
 The report is highly critical of almost all aspects of the current U S . policy in Iraq and urges an immediate change of direction.
 The first of its 78 recommendations is to launch a new diplomatic initiative by the end of this year,
 Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner, the current Argentinian first lady, announced her candidacy last night in La Plata, a city 50 kilometers from Buenos Aires.
 Kirchner chose the Teatro Argentino to announce her candidacy for the Presidency, the same place from which in 2005 she had given the start to her campaign for the Senate as a member of the delegation of the province of Buenos Aires.
 The discussion was sparked by controversy over the spending and reconstruction in the aftermath of Hurricane Katrina, which some fiscal conservatives, in jest, have labeled the New Deal of Bush for New Orleans.
 The liberal criticism of the reconstruction effort focused on the awarding of reconstruction contracts to insiders in Washington.
 Over four million people attended the funeral in Rome.
 The people present were so numerous that it was not possible for all to have access to the funeral in St . Peter's square.
 In various parts of Rome, large television screens were set up to allow people to watch the ceremony.
 Similar installations have been set up in many other Italian cities and around the world, especially in Poland, and a large number of people have watched the event through them.
 Historians criticize the FBI's past policies, arguing that it has concentrated resources on easy-to-solve cases,
 The initiative against obscenity was funded by Congress beginning in fiscal year 2005, with a specific request to the FBI to assign 10 agents to adult pornography.
 Robin Uthappa has scored the highest score of the innings with 70 runs in just 41 balls, scoring 11 fours and 2 sixes.
 Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid, middle order batsmen, played well and scored in collaboration one hundred runs.
 And then the captain lost his wicket, and from that point until the end of the innings, India scored only 36 runs, losing 7 wickets.
 On the morning of November sixteen, the President of the United States, George W . Bush,
 He was received by the vice Prime Minister of Singapore, Wong Kan Seng, and the Prime Minister of Singapore, Lee Hsien Loong, with whom he discussed commercial and terrorism related issues.
 After a week of midterm election losses, Bush gave a speech on the development of trade in Asia.
 After the 25-minute meeting with NDP leader Jack Layton in the PMO, Prime Minister Stephen Harper has agreed to have the government's Clean Air Act reviewed by a committee composed of all parties in preparation for the second reading.
 In the course of the meeting with the Prime Minister, Layton had requested some amendments to the Conservative Party's environmental bill, and had urged a thorough and complete rewrite.
 Since the Federal Government has intervened to fund the Mersey hospital in Devonport, Tasmania, the state government and several MPs have criticised the move as a pre-election stunt ahead of the Federal election in November.
 The prime minister, John Howard, has said the aim of the donation, which was a further AU$45 million,
 According to the latest bulletin, the readings of the sea level have registered the activity of a tsunami near Pago Pago and Niue.
 No damage to property or people was reported in Tonga, although power was temporarily lost and this, according to reports, prevented the Tongan authorities from receiving the tsunami warning from the PTWC.
 Fourteen schools in Hawaii that are near the coasts were closed all day Wednesday,
 The announcement was welcomed by President George W . Bush.
 Gordon Johndroe, a spokesman for Bush, called the North Korean promise a, quote, fundamental step towards the realization of the goal of denuclearization of the Korean peninsula.
 In the Atlantic, the tenth storm of the Atlantic hurricane season, Subtropical storm Jerry,
 At this point, Jerry is no longer a threat to the mainland, according to the National Hurricane Center.
 According to the us Army Corps of engineers,
 The Ninth Ward, where Hurricane Katrina had caused flooding up to twenty feet,
 The water is pouring from a section of the levee that is one hundred feet wide.
 The administrator of Commons, Adam Cuerden, expressed his disapproval of the deletions during his chat with Wikinews last month.
 In other words, Wales lied to us from the beginning,
 Following the outcry from the community, there have been efforts to draft a policy on the site's sexual content, which hosts millions of openly licensed multimedia content.
 The work that has been done has been mostly theoretical, but the program was written to simulate the actual surveys that were done of the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 The effect that the team were looking for was to be caused by the tidal forces between the dark matter of this Galaxy and the dark matter of the Milky way.
 And the moon exercises a force on the earth that generates the tides,
 The scientists were able to deduce that the effects of dark matter on other dark matter are the same as the effects of ordinary matter.
 This theory suggests that most of the dark matter around a Galaxy is collected in a sort of halo, made up of a multitude of small particles.
 The reports show the white smoke coming out of the plant.
 Local authorities are warning people in the area to stay indoors, turn off their air conditioners, and not to drink the water from the tap.
 According to the Japanese nuclear agency, radioactive cesium and iodine have been detected at the plant.
 The authorities' hypothesis is that this indicates a rupture and a consequent loss of the uranium fuel containers at the site.
 Dr Tony Moll has identified extensively drug resistant tuberculosis,
 In an interview, he said this new variant was highly concerning and alarming,
 According to Dr . Moll, some patients may have contracted the microbe inside the hospital, and at least two of them were hospital workers.
 Over the course of a year, one person can infect from 10 to 15 close contacts.
 Despite this, the percentage of XDR-TB in the total group of people affected by tuberculosis still appears to be low,
 The collision between the two satellites, both weighing over 1,000 pounds and traveling at about 17,500 miles per hour,
 The scientists say the collision caused an explosion of immense proportions.
 They're still trying to determine the size of the impact and what consequences it will have on earth.
 The U S . Strategic command of the Department of defense is keeping track of the debris.
 The results of the analysis of the tracks will be published on a public Website.
 The authorities in Ohio report that a doctor who worked at a children's hospital in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, will be charged with aggravated murder after the discovery of his mother's body in the trunk of her car on Wednesday.
 Dr . Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found in Ohio, in the suburb of Blue Ash, about 15 miles north of Cincinnati,
 He directed the agents toward his old black Intrigue that was 500 feet away.
 There, wrapped in blood-stained blankets, was the body of Saroja Balasubramanian, aged 53.
 According to the police, the body had been there for about a day.
 The first cases of the disease were reported at the end of July.
 Pigs are carriers of the disease, which is then transmitted to humans through the bites of mosquitoes.
 The Indian government, spurred on by the epidemic, has taken some measures, such as deploying people to catch the pigs in the most affected areas,
 The government has also promised several million vaccines against encephalitis,
 The plans for the delivery of vaccines in the historically most affected areas this year have been delayed because of a lack of funds and because they have been given a low level of priority over other diseases.
 Three years after his transfer to Sweden in 1956, Słania began working for the Swedish post office,
 He has created more than 1,000 stamps, both for Sweden and for an additional 28 countries.
 The quality and detail of his work are so recognized that his name is one of the very few that is recognized by the average collector.
 In two thousand and ten, it received its one thousandth stamp, the magnificent David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl's
 His work also included the engraving of the banknotes of many countries, including the portraits of the Prime Ministers on the front side of the new Canadian 5 and 100 dollars.
 Gibson, after the incident, was taken to the hospital, but he died shortly after.
 The truck driver, who is 64, came out unharmed from the collision.
 The vehicle involved was removed from the scene of the incident the same day, around 12:00 GMT.
 A person who worked at a nearby auto shop said, quote, there were kids waiting to cross the street,
 They all returned from the place where the accident had occurred.
 Other topics on the agenda in Bali include the saving of the world's last remaining forests and sharing of technology to support the growth of developing nations in a less polluting way.
 The UN also hopes to create a fund to help countries affected by global warming to cope with its impacts.
 The money could be used to build flood-resistant houses, to improve water management and to diversify crops.
 Fluke wrote that the efforts by some to discourage women from speaking openly about women's health have not been successful.
 She has come to this conclusion through the multitude of positive and encouraging comments she has received from both men and women who are pushing for the recognition of contraceptive medicines as a medical necessity.
 At the end of the fighting, once the wounded had been taken to the hospital, about forty of the remaining detainees remained in the courtyard, refusing to return to their cells.
 The negotiators have tried to resolve the situation, but the demands of the inmates are unclear.
 Between two and three o'clock in the morning,
 Soon after, riot control agents entered the courtyard and cornered the inmates, using tear gas.
 The firefighters finally managed to put out the fire at 23:35.
 Following the construction of the dam in 1963, the seasonal flooding that used to spread sediments along the river's course has stopped.
 This sediment was fundamental in the creation of both beaches and sandbars that became habitat for wildlife.
 Two species of fish have become extinct and two others are at risk of becoming extinct, including the Humpbacked Wrasse.
 Even if the flood only raises the water level by a few feet, the authorities hope it will be enough to restore the eroded sandbanks further downstream.
 No tsunami warning has been issued and according to the Jakarta geophysics agency,
 Despite the fact that there was no tsunami risk, residents began to panic, abandoning their businesses and homes.
 Despite the fact that Oprah has said goodbye to her show with tears, she has assured her fans that she will be back.
 And he said, this is not an end, this is a new beginning.
 The results of the Presidential and Parliamentary elections in Namibia saw the re-election of the incumbent President, Hifikepunye Pohamba, who won a significant majority.
 And the ruling party, the South West Africa people's Organisation,
 The coalition and the Afghan troops have reached the area to secure the site, and then the support of other coalition aircraft has arrived.
 The accident is believed to have been caused by enemy fire.
 The search for the site of the crash is hampered by bad weather and rough terrain.
 The organization, Medics Without Borders, and the World Health Organization say this is the worst outbreak they've seen in the country.
 The spokesperson for Medecins Sans Frontieres, Richard Veerman, said,
 Today at 10:00, the weather was magnificent when the games started, and despite a short shower at about midday,
 South Africa, the first seed in the tournament, started off with a bang, winning easily against Zambia, the fifth seed.
 Despite looking rather rusty in the match against the Southern sisters, South Africa has still improved its performance steadily throughout the tournament.
 They were distinguished by their disciplined defense, their ability to handle the ball, and their excellent teamwork.
 The tree, according to officials in the city of Amsterdam and the Anne Frank House, is infested with a fungus and poses a public health risk because, they say, it is in imminent danger of falling.
 It was due to be demolished on Tuesday, but it was saved by an urgent court decision.
 The entrances to the caves, called the seven sisters, are all at least 100 to 250 feet in diameter.
 The infrared images show thermal oscillations between day and night, which is a proof that they are probably caves.
 During the day they are colder than the surrounding surface, and at night they are warmer.
 The temperature of the Martian surface is not constant, as is the case with the large caves on earth, which often maintain a relatively stable temperature,
 In France, the vote is traditionally a low-tech experience: voters enter a booth,
 After verification of his or her identity by the election officials, the voter deposits the ballot in the ballot box and signs the register.
 The French electoral law codifies the procedures in a way that is quite rigorous.
 Since 1988, ballot boxes must be transparent so that voters and observers can witness that no ballot boxes are present at the beginning of the vote,
 Candidates may send their representatives to attend every phase of the process, and in the evening, the volunteers count the votes under strict control,
 The Eee PC, previously launched worldwide for its low cost and functionality, became a controversial topic at the IT Month event in Taipei 2007.
 But the consumer market for notebooks will be greatly changed and different after the Taiwan Sustainable Award was given to ASUS by the executive Yuan of the Republic of China in 2007.
 The site's web page describes the show as old-fashioned, old-timey, old-fashioned, old-timey,
 Initially, the show aired only on the historic Online radio station Toginet radio, which specialized in talk radio.
 TogiNet has established AstroNet radio as a sister station at the end of 2015.
 The show originally used Non-Professional voice actors from East Texas.
 Diffused raids would have continued during the night, given the absence of law enforcement officers on the streets of Biškek.
 According to one witness, Biškek was sinking into a state of anarchy, with bands of people roaming the streets and looting shops.
 Various residents of Bishkek have criticized the protesters in the South for illegal actions.
 South Africa won against the All Blacks in the Rugby Tri Nations match played at the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in Rustenburg.
 The final score was a tie, twenty one to twenty, ending the All Blacks' winning streak of fifteen consecutive victories.
 For the Springboks, this was the end of a losing streak of five consecutive defeats.
 Two weeks earlier, the All Blacks had won the Rugby world cup.
 The final of the tournament, which will see the Springboks take on Australia, will take place next week at Ellis Park in Johannesburg.
 On Monday, a minor earthquake hit Western Montana at 22:08.
 The United States Geological Survey and its National earthquake information center have not received any immediate reports of damage.
 The epicenter of the earthquake was located about 20 km north-northwest of Dillon and about 65 km south of Butte.
 The H5N1 strain of avian influenza, which is deadly to humans, has been confirmed as having killed an escaped duck in the eastern part of France,
 France is the seventh country in the European Union, after Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy, to be hit by the virus.
 The cases under investigation in Croatia and Denmark have not yet been confirmed.
 Chambers had sued God for having sown death, destruction and terror among millions and millions of people on earth.
 According to Chambers, a self-described agnostic, his legal case is superficial and anyone can be sued by anyone.
 The story presented by Camille Saint-Saens at the French opera tells of an artist,
 This means that during the show the actors smoke pipes and urge the audience to join them.
 They are, respectively, Newt Gingrich, the former Speaker of the House, Rick Perry, the governor of Texas, and Michele Bachmann, a member of the House of Representatives.
 After the results came in, Gingrich praised Santorum but heaped harsh words on Romney, for whom negative ads had been running in Iowa.
 Perry has stated, I will return to Texas to verify the results of tonight's caucus and see if there is a path forward for me in this race.
 Bachmann, who won the straw poll in Iowa in August, has decided to end her campaign.
 The photographer was rushed to the Ronald Reagan UCLA medical center, where he later died.
 Bieber has also said, quote, I'm not present nor directly involved in this terrible incident,
 The photographer stopped his vehicle from the opposite side of Sepulveda Boulevard and tried to take a picture of the California Highway Patrol officer who was conducting the traffic check,
 According to police, it's unlikely that the driver of the car that hit the photographer will face any penal charges.
 With only eighteen medals available each day, a good number of countries have failed to make it onto the podium.
 And the Netherlands with Anna Jochemsen in ninth place in the women's Super-G, and Finland with Katja Saarinen in tenth place.
 The Australian Mitchell Gourley has obtained the eleventh place in the men's Super-G, while the Czech athlete Oldrich Jelinek has obtained the sixteenth place in the same speciality.
 The Mexican Arly Velasquez finished in fifteenth place in the men's Super-G, and the New Zealander Adam Hall finished ninth in the men's Super-G.
 The Polish blind skier Maciej Krezel and his guide Anna Ogarzynska finished in thirteenth place in the men's Super-G.
 The UN peacekeepers who arrived in Haiti after the earthquake in two thousand and ten are believed to have brought the disease with them.
 According to the lawsuit, inadequate sanitation of the United Nations camp caused bacterial contamination of the Artibonite River, one of Haiti's main rivers.
 Before the troops arrived, Haiti's problems with cholera dated back to the 1800s.
 The Haitian Institute for Justice and Democracy cited independent studies that the disease was unknowingly introduced to Haiti by the United Nations Nepalese peacekeeping forces.
 Danielle Lantagne, a United Nations expert on the disease, has said that the outbreak may have been caused by the peacekeepers.
 The patient is in stable condition at the Howard University hospital.
 The patient had traveled to Nigeria, where there have been some cases of Ebola virus.
 The hospital followed the protocols for infection control, including isolating the patient to prevent others from being infected.
 Before the Simpsons, Simon had worked on various shows in different roles.
 In the eighty s, he worked on shows like taxi, cheers and the tracey Ullman show.
 In one thousand nine hundred and eighty nine, he participated in the creation of the Simpsons,
 He left the show in 1993, but still retains the title of executive producer, and still collects tens of millions of dollars in royalties each year.
 At first, the Chinese news agency Xinhua had reported the hijacking of a plane.
 According to reports that were received later, the plane had received a bomb threat and was diverted to Kandahar,
 The first reports say that the plane was diverted to Urumqi after it was denied emergency landing in Urumqi.
 Air accidents are common in Iran, whose fleet is now obsolete and poorly maintained, both from a civilian and a military point of view.
 International sanctions meant that they could not buy new aircraft.
 At the beginning of this week, three people were killed and three others injured in an incident involving a police helicopter.
 The month before, Iran had its worst air disaster in years, when a passenger plane crashed in Armenia, killing all 168 people on board.
 The same month saw another airliner crash in Mashad,
 The subsequent concerts of the tour were canceled by Aerosmith.
 The rock group Saranno, who were due to go on tour in the United States and Canada,
 The band canceled the tour after lead singer Steven Tyler was injured in a fall from the stage during a performance on August five.
 Murray lost the first set in a tie-break after the players had maintained the service in each set.
 Del Potro had an early advantage in the second set, which was also ended with a tie-break after the score of 6-6.
 At this point, Del Potro was undergoing treatment for his shoulder but was able to return to play.
 The start of the program was at 20:30 local time,
 Some famous singers from all over the country have offered bhajans, or devotional songs, at the feet of Shri Shyam.
 The singer Sanju Sharma opened the evening, followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary.
 Lakkha Singh then took the lead and started singing the bhajan.
 They were served 108 Chhappan Bhog, which is a Hindu religious offering of 56 different foods, including sweets, fruits, nuts,
 Lakkha Singh also presented the bhajan for the chhappan bhog, accompanied by the singer Raju Khandelwal.
 At the presentation of the Tokyo Game Show on Thursday, Satoru Iwata, president of Nintendo, revealed the design of the new Nintendo Revolution Controller.
 In a way similar to the TV remote control, through two sensors located next to the user's television, the Controller is able to triangulate its position in three-dimensional space.
 This will allow players to control actions and movements within the game by moving the device in the air.
 A few laps later, Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car and ended his race.
 Fernando Alonso, his teammate, was in the lead for most of the race, but his race ended right after his pit stop, probably because of a wrong tire mounting.
 Michael Schumacher reached the finish line behind Alonso, because of a suspension damage that occurred during one of the duels in which he was involved during the race.
 In a press conference, he said, quote, she is very gracious and she sings very well.
 Every time we've done the tests, I've been moved to the depths of my heart.
 About three minutes after launch, a camera on board showed various pieces of insulating foam breaking away from the fuel tank.
 It is not believed, however, that they caused any damage to the shuttle.
 N . Wayne Hale Jr, director of the NASA's space shuttle program, has said that the foam fell after they were concerned about it.
 Five minutes after the beginning of the show, the wind starts, about a minute later, the wind is reaching 70 km per hour,
 I lost my sister and her friend, while I was moving, I had two disabled people in a wheelchair in front of me,
 NHK also reported that the Kashiwazaki Kariwa nuclear power plant, located in Niigata Prefecture,
 The Hokuriku Electric Power Co. reported no damage due to the earthquake, and also reported that the reactor units one and two at the Shika nuclear power plant were shut down.
 According to the report, around 9,400 homes in the area are without water and around 100 without electricity.
 Some roads are damaged, the railway network has been disrupted in the affected areas, and the airport in Ishikawa Prefecture remains closed.
 An explosion has occurred outside the office of the governor general.
 In the space of two hours, three more bombs exploded in the vicinity of government buildings.
 According to some reports, the official death toll is eight, and the official reports confirm that there are up to 30 injured, although the final numbers are not yet known.
 In the urine samples of the deceased who had eaten contaminated pet food, traces of both were found.
 The researchers at the University have said that the two compounds react with each other to form crystals that can hinder the kidney's ability to function.
 Researchers have found the formation of crystals in the urine of cats, due to the addition of melamine and cyanuric acid.
 In comparison via infrared spectroscopy, the composition of these crystals corresponds to that found in the urine of pets that are affected.
 I don't know if you're aware of this or not, but a large part of the goods coming from Central America have entered our country without paying any duties.
 Despite this, 80% of our goods have been taxed with duties in the countries of Central America.
 I didn't think that made sense, and it certainly didn't seem right.
 Everything I say to the people is treat us like we treat you.
 The governor of California, Arnold Schwarzenegger, has signed a bill into law banning the sale or rental of violent Video games to minors.
 The bill would require that all violent Video games sold in the state of California be labeled with a warning that says,
 The Attorney General, Kier Starmer,
 Huhne has resigned and will be replaced in the government by Ed Davey MP.
 The appearance of Huhne and Pryce at Westminster magistrates' court is scheduled for the 16th of February.
 The two victims were Nicholas Alden, a 25-year-old,
 Edgar Veguilla has reported injuries to his arm and jaw, while Kristoffer Schneider will have to undergo a facial reconstruction surgery.
 The Uka weapon did not explode when it was pointed at the head of a fifth man, Schneider has constant pain, is blind in one eye, and has a titanium plate in his skull.
 Schneider has testified via Videoconferencing from a U S . Air Force base in his country.
 In addition to the Wednesday event, the Carpanedo has participated in two single events of the championships.
 The first in the slalom, where at the first run he registered a DNF.
 The other race she participated in, the slalom gigante, she was ranked tenth in the women's category, with a combined time of 4:41.30,
 Four skiers in the women's group failed to finish their runs, and forty five of the one hundred and seventeen participants in the slalom Gigante failed to finish in the slalom Gigante.
 The police in Madhya Pradesh have recovered the laptop and the cell phone that were stolen.
 The vice inspector general, DK Arya, announced,
 The names of the accused are Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanjar, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar and Vishnu Kanjar.
 According to the police superintendent, Chandra Shekhar Solanki, the accused appeared in court with their faces covered.
 None of the three people in the house at the time of the car accident were injured.
 The driver was seriously injured in the head.
 The road on which the accident happened was temporarily closed, while the emergency services freed the driver from the Audi TT red.
 He was initially taken to the James Paget hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was then transferred to Addenbrooke's hospital in Cambridge.
 Since then, Adekoya has been in the custody of the Edinburgh sheriff, charged with the murder of his own son.
 She is detained in custody pending trial and process, but any testimony given by an eyewitness could be tainted,
 In other parts of the United Kingdom, it is a common practice, but in Scotland, the courts have other parameters.
 The use of Video-Recordings has led to important discoveries in the interpretation of micro-expressions,
 The crown office, which has overall responsibility for legal proceedings, has told reporters it will not be making any further comment until the formal charge is made.
 According to leaked documents, the main issue is the dispute over the borders, which Palestine wants to be based on the pre-1967 borders.
 The other topics that are said to be discussed include the future status of Jerusalem, which is sacred to both nations, and the question of the West Bank.
 Once the agreement is signed, Israel demands a permanent military presence in the valley, while the Palestinian authority agrees to withdraw only for five years.
 The rangers who were in charge of the program had to be carefully supervised,
 In the framework of the hunting program of the Sporting Shooters Association, the NPWS in collaboration with the Sporting Shooters Association of Australia,
 According to Mick O'Flynn, acting director of the National Parks and Wildlife service,
 Yesterday Martelly swore in a new Provisional Electoral Council,
 This is the fifth provisional electoral Council in four years.
 Last month a Presidential Commission proposed a package of measures aimed at pushing the country towards new elections, including the resignation of the previous CeP.
 The Commission constituted the response of Martelly to the widespread protests, which began in October, that challenged the regime.
 The protests, which have been occasionally violent, have been triggered by the failure to hold elections, some of which were scheduled as early as 2011.
 There have been about sixty cases of iPod overheating, which have caused a total of six fires and caused minor burns to four people.
 The Japanese Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry has said it is aware of 27 incidents related to the devices.
 The Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry said it had been notified by Apple of another 34 incidents,
 In its response, the Ministry called the delay in the report's release by Apple,
 The earthquake in the Mariana Islands was felt at 07:19 local time,
 According to the office of emergency management of the Northern Mariana Islands, no damage was reported in the nation.
 And the Pacific Tsunami Warning center has reported that there are no signs of a tsunami in progress.
 In the Philippines, a former Filipino policeman hijacked a bus full of Hong Kong tourists.
 With his M16, Rolando Mendoza fired on the tourists.
 Many of the hostages have been rescued, at least six have died.
 Six hostages, including children and the elderly, were released immediately, along with the Filipino photographers.
 The photographers then replaced an elderly lady who needed to use the toilet, and Mendoza was shot dead.
 Liggins has followed in his father's footsteps and become a doctor.
 After training as a nurse, she worked at the National women's hospital in Auckland.
 While working at the hospital, in his spare time, Liggins began to study cases of premature labour.
 His research showed that the administration of a hormone would speed up the maturation of the lungs in the foetus.
 Xinhua reported that government investigators on Wednesday recovered two black boxes with the plane's flight recordings.
 Even his fellow wrestlers wanted to pay tribute to Luna.
 Tommy Dreamer has stated, Luna was the first Queen of the Extreme . My first manager . She passed away on the night of the two moons . One,
 Luna was as crazy as me,
 Second, a poll of one thousand four hundred people before the two thousand and ten Federal election,
 In the course of the 2010 Federal election campaign, the acting Prime Minister, Julia Gillard, stated that she believed that Australia should become a Republic at the end of the reign of Elizabeth II.
 This is a very popular opinion, shared by 34% of the participants in the poll.
 At the opposite end of the scale, twenty nine percent of those surveyed believe that Australia should become a Republic as soon as possible,
 The Olympic gold medalist was expected to compete in the 100 and 200-meter freestyle and three relays at the Commonwealth games,
 He was unable to take the pain medication he needed because it was banned from the games.
 On January twenty five, two thousand and six, Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer science professor at the University of Missouri,
 The discovery was verified by several people through the use of various hardware and software at the beginning of February,
 Comets could have been one of the sources that brought water and organic matter, that is, the stuff that can make proteins and support life,
 Scientists hope to understand how planets form, and in particular, how the earth was formed by colliding with comets a very long time ago.
 Cuomo, 53, has been in office since the beginning of this year as governor and last month signed a bill that made same-sex marriage legal.
 According to him, the speculations are nothing but chatter and political idiocies.
 He is expected to run for President in 2016.
 Second, the FAA says that NextGen will allow planes to fly shorter routes and save millions of gallons of jet fuel each year,
 The system employs satellite technology rather than the outdated radar based on the ground,
 There are no additional trains being put in place, and there are no additional parking or interchange facilities at Wembley.
 The fears of the absence of transportation led to the possibility of the game being played without the support of the home team's fans.
 A new species of bird has been discovered on the Galapagos Islands in Ecuador, according to a study published Thursday in the Journal science.
 The new species evolved in just two generations, although it was thought that the time required for this process was much longer,
 Gold can be worked in any shape or form.
 It can be drawn out to form a thin thread, suitable for being twisted and woven into cords.
 It can be made very thin and attached to other metals, and sometimes it was used to decorate the pictures painted by hand in the books called illuminated manuscripts.
 Using the juice from the red cabbage, it is possible to construct a pH indicator.
 The color of the juice changes based on how acid or alkaline the chemical is.
 The level of pH of the chemical being analyzed is given by the amount of hydrogen ions present.
 Ions of hydrogen are protons to which electrons have been stripped away.
 Mix the two dried powders together and then, with your hands clean and wet, roll them into a ball.
 Between the moisture on your hands and the outer layers,
 Almost all the houses in the cities of Harappa and Mohenjo-Daro had a bathroom with running water connected to an advanced sewage system.
 In Greece, in the Minoan cities of Crete and Santorini, there have been found remains of sewage systems.
 In ancient Egypt, Persia and China, the toilet was sometimes included in the public baths,
 To call someone thousands of miles away, you use a satellite.
 The satellite in space receives the signal and then sends it back almost instantly.
 The launch of the satellite into space is done with a rocket, and scientists use space telescopes because the earth's atmosphere distorts and blurs the view.
 To carry a satellite or a telescope into space, a rocket must be more than 100 feet high.
 The wheel has changed the world in many ways, but the most important is that it has made transportation easier and faster.
 Thanks to his invention, the train, the automobile and several other means of transportation have come into existence.
 Below them are other medium-sized cats that prey on medium-sized prey, ranging from rabbits to hares and deer.
 There are many small cats, including feral cats, which prey on small prey, including insects, rodents, lizards, and birds.
 The concept of a niche is the secret of their success, a particular niche that each cat has and that allows them to not compete with each other.
 Lions are the most social of all cats, and they live in large groups called prides.
 The males are composed of adult males, usually two or three,
 Usually the females are closely related to each other, being a large family of daughters and sisters.
 The lion's behaviour is very much like that of the Wolf or dog, whose behaviour is in fact surprisingly analogous to that of the lion,
 A complete athlete, the tiger can climb, swim, jump, and exert a pulling force five times that of a strong man.
 The tiger belongs to the same family as the lion, the leopard, and the jaguar,
 The roar of the tiger is not as powerful as that of the lion, but it is more like a series of words shouted and angry.
 Ocelots love to eat small animals, and if possible, they go after monkeys, snakes, rodents, and birds,
 Scientists believe that Ocelots follow and find their prey by smelling it on the ground where it has been.
 Thanks to their night vision, they are able to see very well in the dark, and are also able to move around stealthily.
 When a small group of living things separates from the main population to which it belongs,
 This new environment is characterized by different resources and competitors, so in order to stand out as a strong competitor, the new population will need different characteristics or transformations than those that were necessary in the past.
 The original population has not changed at all, and it still needs the same adaptations as before.
 As time goes on and as the new population adapts to its new environment, it looks less and less like the other population.
 At a certain point, after thousands or even millions of years, the two populations will appear so different from each other that they will no longer be defined as belonging to the same species.
 The process of speciation is inevitable and is a fundamental element of evolution.
 Plants produce the oxygen that is breathed by humans and absorb the carbon dioxide that is exhaled by them.
 Plants make their own food by using the sunlight through a process called Photosynthesis.
 We build our houses from plants and we make our clothes from plants, and most of the food that we eat is made from plants.
 The Mosasaurus was the top predator of its era and, as such, feared nothing but other Mosasaurs.
 From its long fangs, more than seventy sharp as razors,
 We don't know for sure, but it's possible that it had a forked tongue, and its diet included turtles, large fish, other mosasaurs, and it's possible it was a cannibal.
 He would attack anything that entered the water, even a giant dinosaur like the T-Rex.
 Although most of their foods would seem familiar to us, the Roman banquets also featured several unfamiliar or unusual dishes, such as wild boar, peacock, snails, and a rodent called the hare.
 Another difference was that while the poor and the women ate while seated on chairs, the rich men loved to feast together while reclining on a couch.
 And the foods that we eat today are not the same as the foods that our ancestors ate thousands of years ago.
 For example, they had no maize, tomatoes, potatoes or cacao, and none of the ancient Romans had ever tasted a turkey.
 The Babylonians built a main temple for each deity, which was considered the deity's home.
 People brought sacrifices to the gods and the priests tried to provide for the needs of the gods through ceremonies and festivals.
 Every temple had an open courtyard and then a sacred inner sanctuary accessible only to priests.
 Sometimes, they were built in the form of a pyramid, called a ziggurat, which became part of the temple.
 The top of the tower was a sanctuary dedicated to the god.
 And because of the mild climate,
 A lot of the Jewish life took place outdoors.
 The women cooked in the courtyard, while the shops were simple open stalls that faced the street.
 In the land of Canaan, there were no great forests, so wood was very expensive.
 Greenland was sparsely populated, and in the Norse Sagas it is said that Erik the Red gave it its name after he had been exiled from Iceland for murder.
 But, in spite of his discovery, at that time the Eskimo tribes were already living there.
 Although all were Scandinavian, the peoples, Kings, customs, and history of Denmark, Sweden, Norway, and Iceland were very different.
 If you've seen the movie, the Da Vinci code, you might think that the back of the Declaration of Independence has a map of the treasure.
 However, this is false, even though there is something written on the back of the document, it is not a treasure map.
 On the back of the Declaration of Independence is the inscription, in reverse, the original Declaration of Independence, July fourth, seventeen seventy six.
 Although it is not known for certain who wrote it, it is well known that at the beginning of its existence the large parchment document, which measures 29.75 inches by 24.5 inches,
 And the wording of the inscription is very similar to the one on the other side.
 The D-Day landings and the fighting that followed had brought the North of France to liberation, but the South was still occupied.
 It was governed by the Vichy regime, that is, by those Frenchmen who in 1940 had made peace with the Germans and were allied with the invaders, instead of fighting them.
 On August fifteenth, nineteen forty, the Allies invaded Southern France,
 The Americans and the French liberated the South of France in just two weeks,
 By civilization, we mean a specific culture, shared by a group of people who live and work in a collaborative way,
 The word civilization derives from the Latin word civilis, which means civil,
 The city-states were the first to anticipate the idea of a nation,
 Minority cultures often disappear without leaving a trace,
 During the war of independence, the thirteen States formed a central government for the first time,
 The Congress had no power to levy taxes, and, given the absence of a national executive or judiciary,
 He had no authority to override tax laws and tariffs between the States.
 To modify the articles required the unanimous consent of all the states,
 The Italian national football team is, along with the German national football team, the second most successful football team in the world,
 Among the most popular sports are: football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, Rugby, Cycling, ice hockey, and Formula 1 auto racing.
 The winter sports are more widespread in the northern regions and see Italians engaged in international competitions and in the Olympic events.
 Japan is made up of almost 7,000 Islands, and this makes it the seventh largest archipelago in the world.
 From a geographical point of view, Japan is referred to as an archipelago,
 Taiwan is born in the fifteenth century, when European sailors who were passing through the area register the name of the island as Ilha Formosa, or the wonderful Island.
 The Dutch East India company established a base in the Southwest of Taiwan in sixteen twenty four,
 In 1683, the Western and northern coastal areas of Taiwan came under the control of the Qing dynasty,
 After being defeated in the first Sino-Japanese war,
 Machu Picchu comprises three primary structures, and notably the Intihuatana, the temple of the sun, and the temple of the three windows.
 A great part of the perimeter buildings have been rebuilt to give tourists a more accurate idea of their original appearance.
 In the nineteen seventy s, thirty percent of the site of Machu Picchu had been recovered,
 The most common format in the world for still photography, for example, is 35 mm, the same as the most commonly used film format at the end of the analogue era.
 It is still produced today and, more importantly, its aspect ratio is inherited from the sensor sizes of Digital cameras.
 And the height of the 35 mm is 24 mm and the width is 36 mm.
 The proportions of this format, dividing by twelve to get the simplest ratio of integers,
 The proportions of many of the common form factors, such as the family of APS form factors,
 The much-maligned rule of thirds is a simple guideline that creates dynamism while maintaining a measure of order within an image.
 Second, the most effective place to position the main subject corresponds to the intersection of the lines that divide the image into thirds, both vertically and horizontally.
 In this phase of European history, the Catholic Church, which had become rich and powerful,
 The Christian religion had acted as a glue between the European States for over a thousand years, despite differences in language and custom.
 His all-pervading power has influenced everyone from the King to the common people.
 One of the foundations of Christianity is that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty, and that the church's monetary reserves exist for that very purpose.
 The central authority of the church has remained in Rome for over a thousand years, and this convergence of power and money has led many to ask if this principle has been respected.
 Soon after the beginning of the war, Britain decided to enact a naval blockade of Germany.
 The strategy proved effective the blockade was intended to disrupt any and all military and civilian supplies,
 Britain mined the international waters to prevent the access of any ship to entire sections of the ocean, putting even neutral ships at risk.
 Since this tactic had elicited a limited response, Germany expected a similar response to its unrestricted submarine campaign.
 In the nineteen twenty s, the prevailing attitudes of most citizens and nations were pacifism and isolation.
 After witnessing the horrors and atrocities of World War I, nations desired to avoid a similar situation in the future.
 In eighteen eighty four, Tesla accepted a job offer from the Edison company in New York City,
 He arrived in the United States with four cents in his pocket, a book of poems, and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor,
 In ancient China, the different periods of time were indicated in a very unique way,
 The period between the Han dynasty and the Jin dynasty is known as the three kingdoms period,
 In these periods, between many nobles in lotta per il trono si accesero guerre feroci.
 The period of the three kingdoms was one of the most violent in the history of ancient China,
 The social and political effects are numerous, among these are the use of the metric system, the transition from absolutism to the Republic, nationalism, and the belief that the nation belongs to the people and not to a single sovereign.
 And after the Revolution, the professions were open to all candidates, men, allowing the most ambitious and the most fortunate to succeed.
 The same is true of the military, since the Army's rank system is now based on caliber instead of class.
 The French Revolution was a source of inspiration for many other oppressed workers in various countries to start their own revolutions.
 But Muhammad was deeply interested in matters beyond this life.
 The cave, which has survived the passage of time, offers a very clear image of the spirituality of Muhammad.
 The cave is located on the top of one of the mountains to the north of Mecca, completely detached from the rest of the world.
 In reality, it's not at all easy to find, even though it's known to exist.
 There is nothing to be seen or heard from the interior of the cave,
 Among the seven wonders of the world, the great pyramid of Giza is the only one that has survived to the present day,
 Built by the Egyptians in the third century B . C,
 The plain of Giza, or the Giza Necropolis, in the valley of the Kings in Egypt, is home to a number of pyramids,
 The important pyramid was created in honor of the pharaoh Cheops, and many of the smaller pyramids, tombs, and temples were built to honor the pharaoh's wives and family.
 The indication arcata in su looks like a V, and the indication arcata in giù looks like a little square with the bottom cut off.
 And the way to do that is to start from the top and push the bow down, or start from the bottom and pull the bow up.
 An upward bowed string generally produces a softer sound, while a downward bowed string produces a louder and more decided sound.
 You can add your own personalized indications with a pencil, but keep in mind that the arched marks you find printed have a musical value, so in line of principle they should be respected.
 On October six, seventeen eighty nine, a crowd of women from the market, in a panic, forced King Louis the sixteenth,
 They returned to Paris, surrounded by a crowd of people who shouted and yelled threats against the sovereigns.
 The crowd forced the King and the queen to keep the windows of their carriage wide open.
 At one point, someone in the crowd showed the terrified queen the head of a guard who had been killed at Versailles.
 The costs of the United States' war to conquer the Philippines were paid by the Filipinos themselves.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the U S . government to cover most of the expenses, and the interest on the bonds was paid through Wall Street banks.
 And the profits from the exploitation of the Filipino people were the profits that underpinned U S . imperialism.
 To understand the Templars, we need to understand the context that led to the creation of this order.
 The period in which these events took place is commonly called the high Middle Ages,
 The high Middle Ages were preceded by the early Middle Ages and followed by the late Middle Ages, which end around the year one thousand.
 Determinism is a term that includes in practice a wide range of ideas, from technological innovation or the technological imperative to the narrow sense of the word,
 The two main ideas that are shared by most of the interpretations of technological determinism are that the development of technology follows a path that is very much beyond political and cultural effects,
 For example, we can say that the automobile necessarily entails the development of the road network.
 However, a national road network for only a few cars is not economically sustainable, and new methods of production are being developed to reduce the costs of owning a car.
 The possession of mass automobiles also leads to a higher percentage of accidents on the roads, and consequently the invention of new techniques for the care of injured people.
 The romanticism was characterized by a strong component of cultural determinism, drawn from authors such as Goethe, Fichte and Schlegel.
 And in the course of time, usages, customs and culture have emerged from it,
 Similarly, as Paris is nowadays the world's fashion capital,
 Its notoriety as a center of luxury began around the year 400 and lasted until about 1100.
 During the twelfth century, its prestige declined, especially because the crusaders returned with goods such as silk and spices, which were valued more than the goods that the Byzantine markets offered.
 At this point, the title of fashion capital moved from Constantinople to Paris.
 The height of the Gothic style was reached between the X and the XI century,
 Initially, the clothing was influenced by the Byzantine culture of the East.
 But the slowness of communication means that the styles take 25 to 30 years to spread.
 Towards the end of the Middle Ages, Western Europe began to develop its own style, and one of the most significant developments of the time was the introduction of buttons to fasten clothes.
 Agriculture is defined as subsistence when it is practiced for the sole purpose of producing enough to meet the food needs of the farmer and his or her family.
 The agriculture of subsistence is a simple system, usually of the biological type, which uses seeds originally from the region,
 Historically, most farmers practiced subsistence agriculture, and in many developing countries, it's still the case.
 Underground cultures unite individuals with the same opinions, who do not feel represented by the mainstream society, allowing them to develop a sense of identity.
 Subcultures are distinguished by age, ethnicity, class, and or the gender of its members.
 The characteristics that define a subculture may be of a linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual, geographic, or a combination of factors.
 Members of a subculture often indicate their membership through a peculiar and symbolic use of style,
 One of the most common methods of explaining the importance of socialization is to analyze some unfortunate cases of children who, through neglect,
 These children are called feral or wild. Some of them have been segregated by people,
 Feral children may have suffered serious abuse or trauma before being abandoned or running away.
 Other children may have been raised by animals, and still others seem to have lived alone in the wild.
 When a feral child is totally raised by non-human animals, it shows behaviors almost entirely analogous to those of the particular animal that has taken care of him, such as fear or indifference towards man.
 The project based learning should make learning itself easier and more interesting, while the scaffolding goes a bit beyond that.
 Scaffolding is not a mode of learning, but rather a support for those who are undertaking a new learning experience, such as using a new computer program or starting a new project.
 The scaffolding can be both virtual and real . In other words, a teacher is an example of scaffolding, but so is the little assistant in Microsoft office.
 The virtual scaffolds are integrated into the software and have the purpose of interrogating, soliciting and explaining the procedures that the student may have had difficulty in managing on their own.
 The children are given up for various reasons, ranging from abandonment to abuse, if not even to extortion.
 A child should never grow up in an environment that does not provide nutrition, care, and education, but to them it happens.
 We believe that the foster care system is a safe place for these children.
 Our foster care system should provide safe homes, loving foster parents, stable education, and reliable health care.
 It is supposed that the affidavit will supply all the necessities not supplied in the home from which they were taken.
 The Internet combines some of the characteristics of both mass communication and interpersonal communication.
 The characteristic elements of the Internet lead to supplementary dimensions in terms of the uses and gratifications theory.
 For example, as important motivations for using the Internet are suggested learning and socialization.
 The study by Eighmey and McCord, two new aspects of motivation were identified, namely, personal involvement and continuing relationships.
 The use of Video-Recordings has allowed for significant discoveries in the interpretation of Micro-Expressions, which are facial movements lasting only a few milliseconds.
 In the specific, it is argued that it is possible to discover if a person is lying by correctly interpreting the micro expressions.
 In his book, the man who mistook his wife for a hat,
 He even goes so far as to suggest that these abilities to interpret human behaviour can be shared with animals, such as dogs.
 In the twentieth century, research has demonstrated the existence of two pools of genetic variability,
 With mutation, a new genetic variability is added, and with selection, it is eliminated from the pool of expressed variability.
 Generation after generation, segregation and recombination redistribute the variability forward and backward between the two pools.
 For a primate with an analogous digestive apparatus to that of humans, it is difficult to meet its amino acid needs with the vegetable resources available in the savanna.
 In addition, the lack of these activities has serious consequences: stunted growth, malnutrition, and, in the end, even death.
 The most easily accessible vegetable resources would have been the proteins in leaves and legumes, but for primates like us,
 And the foods of the animal Kingdom are not only easy to digest, but they also provide a high percentage of proteins,
 In the light of all this, it should not surprise us that our own ancestors solved their own protein problem in a way that is very similar to how our own ancestors solved theirs.
 The interruption of sleep is the intentional process of waking up during the normal period of sleep, which is followed by a resumption of sleep.
 This process can be easily put into practice by using a relatively quiet alarm clock to bring you to a state of consciousness,
 If you decide to reset the clock while you're asleep, you can put it on the other side of the room so that you'll be forced to get out of bed to turn it off.
 Other biorhythm-focused options include the consumption of many fluids before going to bed, especially water or tea, known for its diuretic properties,
 A person enjoys a peace of mind proportionate to the tension existing in his body and in his spirit.
 The less tension, the more positive is the vital force that exists in each one of us.
 Everyone can reach enlightenment . This goal is only hindered by our tension and our negativity.
 The Tibetan form of Buddhism is based on the teachings of the Buddha, but it has been enriched by the love teachings of the Mahayana and by various Indian yoga techniques.
 In general, Tibetan Buddhism is very simple, based on Kundalini yoga, meditation, and a path of all-encompassing love.
 Kundalini yoga activates the Kundalini energy through the use of yoga postures, breathing exercises, Mantras, and visualizations.
 The Deity Yoga is the core of Tibetan meditation, whereby the Deities are visualized,
 The two countries have been at odds since the end of the war,
 Two years after the end of the war, the allies of the past had become enemies, and the cold war began.
 It would last for the next 40 years and would be fought by mercenary armies,
 On September 17, the Polish defense had already been broken through, and the only option was to retreat and reorganize along the Romanian bridgehead.
 These plans proved obsolete, however, when more than 800,000 Soviet Army troops advanced and created the Belorussian and the Ukrainian fronts,
 Using ships to transport goods is certainly the most efficient way to move large volumes of people and goods across the oceans.
 The Navy has always had the task of ensuring that the country can move its people and goods, while at the same time preventing the enemy from doing the same.
 One of the most notable examples of this is the battle of the Atlantic during the second World War.
 At the same time, the German Navy, using mostly U-Boats,
 If the Allies had not succeeded, Germany probably would have been able to conquer Britain,
 And it seems that goats were first domesticated around ten thousand years ago in the Zagros mountains of Iran.
 They were first raised by cultures and tribes of the ancient world to have easily available milk, wool, meat, and leather.
 Goats were usually kept in herds that were allowed to roam freely on hills or other grazing areas, often tended by shepherds,
 Already in the sixteenth century, in England, wagonways were built.
 Wagonways, although they were simply made of wooden rails,
 The rails were introduced relatively early on to keep the rails in position, but gradually it was realised that the rails would be more efficient if they had a top iron bar.
 It became a common practice, although the iron caused greater wear and tear to the wooden wheels of the cars.
 And finally, in the eighteenth century, the first iron wheels were introduced.
 The first means of transportation that mankind has known are the legs.
 His predecessor, the Australopithecus,
 And signs of bipedalism are present in the Australopithecus fossils dating to 4.2 to 3.9 million years ago,
 To try to mitigate in some way the future sufferings, we can start to adopt lifestyles that are more respectful of the environment,
 In many cases, this only works as a symptomatic treatment, but if we want a permanent solution, we should find the root cause and dismantle it.
 It is quite evident that the world has changed a lot because of the scientific and technological progress of mankind, while the problems have increased because of the overpopulation and the extravagant lifestyle of mankind.
 After the Congress adopted it on July four, a handwritten draft signed by the President of the Congress, John Hancock, and the Secretary, Charles Thomson,
 In the night, between one hundred and two hundred copies were produced, and are now known as the Dunlap editions.
 The document was read publicly for the first time on July 8 in the courtyard of Independence hall,
 One was sent to George Washington on the 6th of July, which he read to his troops in New York on the 9th of July,
 The 25 Dunlap broadsides that exist today are the oldest known copies of the document,
 According to many paleontologists of today, one category of dinosaurs is still alive,
 Many tend to not consider them dinosaurs because of their feathers and their ability to fly.
 And yet birds have many characteristics in common with dinosaurs.
 Like the T-Rex, they have feet with claws and they lay eggs and walk on their hind legs.
 In the end, the manipulation of information coded in the form of Binary numbers is at the heart of all computers in use today.
 A Binary number can have only one of two values, zero or one, and in the technical language of computing, these numbers are called Binary digits or bits.
 The internal poisoning may not be immediately evident, and its symptoms, including vomiting, are so general as to make an immediate diagnosis impossible.
 The main indication of internal poisoning could be the presence in the house of an open container of drugs or of noxious chemicals.
 Check the label to see if it has first aid instructions for that specific poison.
 The term arachnoid is used by entomologists for this group of insects.
 The term comes from the familiarity in ancient times with bed bugs, insects that have become highly adapted to become parasites of man.
 Both bed bugs and assassin bugs are nidicolous, which means they are adapted to live in the nests or homes of their hosts.
 In the United States of America, multiple sclerosis,
 The SM is a condition that affects the central nervous system, which includes the brain, spinal cord and optic nerve.
 Research has shown that the chances of developing MS are twice as high in women as in men.
 A couple may decide that raising a child is not in their interest, or in the interest of their own child.
 And the parents have the option of choosing a plan for their child.
 In an adoption, the natural parents give up their parental rights so that another couple can raise the child.
 The primary goal of science is to understand how the world works through the scientific method, which guides most of the scientific inquiry.
 But it is not only experimentation that is involved in research, for experimentation is only a test to exclude one or more of the possible hypotheses.
 Naturalists and philosophers focused on the classical texts, particularly the Latin version of the Bible.
 The opinions of Aristotle on the various subjects of knowledge, including psychology,
 With the progressive decline of the Greek language, the West was isolated from its Greek philosophical and scientific roots.
 In many, it has been observed that the physiological rhythms and the behavior depend in a determinant way from the presence of endogenous cycles and from their production through the biological clocks.
 There have been documented periodic rhythms, which are not just reactions to periodic external signals,
 Biological clocks are independent oscillators, whose free cycle continues for a period of time even in the absence of external stimuli.
 One of the first experiments to suggest that DNA was a genetic material was that of Hershey and Chase.
 Hershey and Chase used bacteriophage,
 They have performed two experiments, highlighting the DNA of the bacteriophage with radioactive phosphorus or the protein of the bacteriophage with radioactive sulfur.
 Mutations can have a range of different effects depending on the type of Mutation, the relevance of the piece of genetic material involved,
 The mutations that can be passed on to children are only those that occur in the germ cells,
 The naturalist tourism attracts people interested in visiting natural areas for the purpose of enjoying the scenery, including the flora and fauna.
 Among the activities to be done on the spot are hunting, fishing, photography, bird watching, visits to parks and the study of information regarding the ecosystem.
 For example, by visiting, photographing and learning about the orangutans of Borneo.
 Every morning, people leave the small towns of the countryside in their cars to go to work, and they meet other people on the way to work who are coming from the same place they have just left.
 In this dynamic back and forth, everyone is in some way connected to a system of transportation that is based on private cars,
 Today, science reveals that this massive, carbon-based economy has forced the biosphere beyond one of its conditions of stability that has allowed human evolution over the last two million years.
 Everyone participates in the social life and uses the transportation systems, of which almost everyone complains.
 In the developed countries, it's rare to hear such levels of complaint about the quality of water or the bridges that are falling apart.
 Why do the transportation systems attract so many complaints? are the engineers who design them incompetent, or are there deeper motivations?
 The traffic flow is the study of the movement of individuals and vehicles from one point to another and the interactions that they generate with each other.
 Unfortunately, the study of traffic flow is complex because the behavior of drivers cannot be predicted with absolute certainty.
 Fortunately, the behavior of drivers tends to fall within a reasonably constant range,
 In order to obtain a more accurate representation of the traffic flow, the three main variables were correlated as follows:
 These relationships are useful in planning, designing, and managing road structures.
 Insects were the first animals to take to the air, and the ability to fly made it easier for them to escape enemies and to find food and mates more efficiently.
 Most insects are advantageously equipped with wings that can be folded along the body.
 This allows them to take advantage of a wider variety of small crevices in which to hide from predators.
 Among all the insects that exist today, the only ones that cannot fold their wings are the dragonflies and the damselflies.
 Thousands of years ago, a man named Aristarchus said that the solar system moved around the sun.
 For some, it was right, for many others, it was wrong, and the earth was stationary,
 And the earth is not moving, no?
 The Amazon River is the largest and second longest river in the world, carrying eight times the amount of water that the second largest river carries.
 The Amazon is also the widest River in the world, with a width that in some places reaches six miles.
 The total amount of water that the rivers of the planet carry to the oceans is twenty percent of the total water that the rivers carry.
 The river Amazon is the longest river in the world, and it is the largest river in the world in terms of the volume of water it carries.
 Pyramids were built in stone until the end of the old Kingdom, but despite this, the Giza pyramids were never surpassed in terms of their size and technical excellence.
 The ancient Egyptians of the New Kingdom were still in awe of the monuments of their ancestors, who were by then over a thousand years old.
 The Vatican city is the smallest independent country in the world, with a population of about eight hundred people.
 The language of the Vatican city for legislation and official communications is Italian.
 Italian is also the everyday language spoken by most people who work within the state, while Latin is often used in religious functions.
 In the Vatican city, all citizens are Roman Catholics.
 Man has been aware of the basic chemical elements such as gold, silver and copper since ancient times,
 According to the philosopher Aristotle, everything is composed of one or more of the following four elements: earth, water, air and fire.
 These in fact are more like the four states of matter, namely, solid, liquid, gaseous, and plasma.
 The alloys are basically a mixture of two or more metals . keep in mind that the periodic table contains many elements.
 The elements such as calcium and potassium are considered to be metals.
 There may also be alloys composed of very small quantities of Non-Metals, such as carbon.
 In the universe, everything is made of matter and all matter is made up of tiny particles called atoms.
 Atoms are incredibly small, so small that trillions of them could fit into the point at the end of this sentence.
 After its invention, the pencil has become a good friend to many.
 Unfortunately, with the introduction of new writing methods, the pencil has been relegated to a lesser status and to a use that is less and less common.
 Today, everyone writes messages on the screens of computers and never has the need to approach a temperamatite.
 We can only wonder what the future holds for the keyboard when something even more advanced arrives.
 The principle that energy is required to put together a nucleus with many protons and neutrons is at the heart of the fission bomb.
 And as the nucleus is split up,
 Some atoms have unstable nuclei, which means that they tend to break up in the presence of a very small or no push.
 The surface of the moon is made up of rocks and dust, and its outer layer is called the crust.
 The crust is about seventy kilometers thick on the side nearest the earth and about one hundred kilometers thick on the side farthest away.
 It is thinner under the seas and thicker under the mountainous areas.
 The Maria could be more numerous on the near side because the crust is thinner, which has facilitated the upward flow of the lava.
 Theories on content are centered on the search for what satisfies or attracts individuals.
 According to these theories, people have certain needs and or desires that are internalized as they become adults.
 These theories analyze what it is that brings certain people together and pushes them to do what they do, and what are the factors in the context in which they live that pushes them to do or not do certain things.
 Among the most popular theories are Maslow's hierarchy of needs and Herzberg's two-factor theory.
 In general, when managers start to direct their former colleagues, there are two possible attitudes.
 The manager of this type finds it difficult to take unpopular decisions, to put in place disciplinary actions, to evaluate performance, to define and assign responsibility.
 At the other extreme, the manager transforms himself into a completely different person, who feels that he must change the whole team and make it his own.
 And the leader is the person who is ultimately responsible for the success or failure of the team.
 This attitude often generates dissent between the leaders and the rest of the team.
 The standard of excellence of the virtual teams is similar to that of the conventional teams, but with some small differences.
 The members of the virtual team often serve as a point of contact for their next physical team.
 They often have greater autonomy than members of the conventional squads, as the meetings may take place at different times of the day, which may not be covered by the local management.
 The existence of a real and a virtual team is also a fundamental element of a virtual team.
 This is the team that everyone refers to and is the team that sets the standards for each member.
 And the reason why an organization would want to go through the long process of building a learning organization is innovation.
 When you can use all the resources available in all the functional departments of an organization,
 And the process of collaboration within an organization to overcome an obstacle can lead to a new innovative process to meet the needs of the customer.
 For an organization to be innovative, leaders must create a culture of innovation, as well as a shared knowledge and an organizational learning.
 Angel, in two thousand and six, illustrated the theory of the continuum as a method used to help organizations reach higher levels of performance.
 The neurobiological results have demonstrated the physical existence of a theoretical approach to the investigation of cognition.
 The link between brain disease and behaviour is at the heart of the researchers' work.
 It has long been known that certain types of brain damage, trauma, injury and tumors can affect behavior and modify certain mental functions.
 The introduction of new technologies allows us to see and investigate brain structures and processes that were never seen before.
 This gives us a great deal of information and material to create simulation models that help us to understand our mental processes.
 Despite having a strong Sci-Fi connotation, ai is a very important branch of computer science that deals with intelligent behavior, learning, and adapting machines.
 AI research includes the creation of machines to automate tasks that require intelligent behavior.
 Some examples of application are control, planning and scheduling, the ability to respond to diagnoses and questions from customers,
 These things have become distinct disciplines,
 The IA system is nowadays used in the economic, medical, engineering and military fields, and is also integrated into several software applications for home computers and video games.
 Field trips are a fundamental part of the curriculum, and teachers often want to take their students to places that are not easily accessible by bus.
 The solution is offered by virtual tours. Students can see the artifacts of museums, visit an aquarium, or admire beautiful works of art while sitting in class.
 Sharing a virtual field trip is also a great way to share experiences and reflections of the trip with future classes.
 For example, every year the students of Bennett school in North Carolina,
 Blogs can also help students improve their writing skills . Often, in fact, their first experiences with Blogs are marked by poor grammar and spelling,
 Since students are usually the most critical audience, the author of the Blog tries to avoid negative judgments.
 Blogs also, as one student put it, force students to become more aware of the moment that surrounds them.
 The Blog is a tool that is designed to encourage collaboration and develop student learning beyond the school day.
 The correct use of Blogs can help students become more critical and analytical,
 Ottawa is the bilingual, bustling capital of Canada, rich in art galleries and museums that tell the country's past and present.
 To the South are the Niagara falls and to the North is the beautiful and unspoiled nature of the Muskoka region and much more.
 All of this and more makes Ontario typically Canadian in the opinions of foreigners.
 The wide areas to the north are sparsely populated, and some of them are almost uninhabited.
 If we compare the population, the result may be surprising to many people,
 The Islands of East Africa are located in the Indian ocean, off the East Coast of Africa.
 Madagascar is by far the largest and its natural heritage makes it a continent unto itself.
 Almost all of the smaller Islands, known as luxurious seaside resorts,
 And in the lands, the Arabs also brought Islam, which began a long journey to the Comoros and Mayotte.
 In the fifteenth century, the discovery of the Cape route, which went from Europe to India, by the Portuguese explorer Vasco Da Gama,
 To the North, the region is delimited by Sahel, while to the South and West it is bordered by the Atlantic ocean.
 For travellers, it is recommended that all women declare themselves to be married,
 It is also useful to wear a ring,
 Women should be aware that cultural differences can lead to what they consider to be harassment, and that it is not unusual to be followed, grabbed by the arm, etc.
 Have the strength to refuse men, and be not afraid to oppose them,
 The modern city of Casablanca was founded by Berber fishermen in the tenth century BC,
 The Portuguese destroyed it and rebuilt it as Casa Branca, which they abandoned in 1755 after a terrible earthquake.
 The Moroccan Sultan rebuilt the city, which was called Daru l-Badya, then renamed Casablanca by the Spanish traders who chose these places for their trading posts.
 In all of Morocco, Casablanca is one of the least interesting cities for shopping.
 In the old Medina, it's easy to find places that sell traditional Moroccan products, such as Tajin, ceramics, leather goods, Narghilas, and tons of chincaglieria,
 Goma is a tourist city located in the most eastern part of the Democratic Republic of the Congo,
 In two thousand and two, the lava from the Nyiragongo volcano destroyed Goma, burying most of the city's roads, especially those in the centre.
 While Goma is reasonably safe, it is wise to do your own research before you make any visits outside of Goma, in order to assess the current state of the conflict that is still ongoing in the North Kivu province.
 The city is also the starting point for the ascent of the Nyiragongo volcano,
 It is possible to use a boda-boda, a motorcycle taxi, to move around Goma.
 And it was also a place that was very difficult to get to, and it became a metaphor for a place that was exotic and far away.
 Today, Timbuktu is a decadent city, but for its reputation it remains a tourist attraction, with an airport as well.
 In the nineteen ninety s, the site was added to the UNESCO list of world heritage sites in danger,
 In the PBS special, Wonders of the African world,
 With its more Arabic than African touch, the city stands out from the rest of the country.
 The Kruger National Park is located in the northeast of South Africa, and it stretches eastward along the border with Mozambique,
 With a surface area of 19,500 square kilometres, the park encompasses 14 different ecozones, each of which supports a different wildlife.
 The Hershey and Chase experiment was one of the leading suggestions that DNA was a genetic material.
 As with all national parks in South Africa, there are daily conservation and entrance fees.
 The purchase of a wild card also allows for access to a selection of parks in South Africa or to all South African national parks.
 The island of Hong Kong, which gives its name to the entire territory, is a major tourist destination.
 The series of buildings that make up the skyline of Hong Kong has been compared to a scintillating bar graph,
 To enjoy the best views of Hong Kong, abandon the island and visit the Kowloon waterfront across.
 The majority of Hong Kong's urban development has been concentrated on the reclaimed land of the northern coast, which is densely populated.
 This is the place that the British colonizers chose for themselves, so if you're looking for evidence of the colonial past of this land,
 The Sundarbans are the largest Mangrove forest in the world, extending for 80 km from the coast in the hinterland of Bangladesh and India.
 The Sundarbans are a UNESCO world heritage site, and the part of the forest included in the Indian territory is called Sundarbans National Park.
 The forests are not only made up of Mangrove swamps, but also contain the remnants of the once extensive jungles that covered the Ganges plain.
 The Sundarbans cover an area of 3,850 km², of which about a third is made up of swampy areas.
 Since 1966, the Sundarbans have become a sanctuary for wildlife, with an estimated 400 Bengal tigers and around 30,000 spotted deer.
 Buses depart from the inter-district bus station along the river all day long, although many of them, especially those going to the east and to Jakar,
 Because buses that run between different districts are often full, it is best to buy the ticket a few days in advance.
 The majority of the districts are served by comfortable and sturdy little Japanese buses.
 Shared taxis are a convenient and fast way to get to nearby locations, including Paro and Punakha.
 The bridge over the Oyapock River is a suspension bridge that connects the city of Oiapoque, in Brazil, to Saint-Georges de l'Oyapock, in French Guiana.
 Its two trusses have a height of 83 meters, it is 378 meters long and has two lanes 3.50 meters wide.
 Underneath the bridge, the free vertical space is 15 meters.
 By September 2017, when Brazilian customs checkpoints are expected to be fully operational, the bridge should be fully functional.
 The Guaraní were the most important indigenous group living in the present-day Eastern Paraguay.
 The region of the Chaco was inhabited by other indigenous groups such as the Guaycuru and the Payaguá, who lived by hunting, gathering and fishing.
 Paraguay, formerly called the great province of the Indies,
 The Spaniards began a period that lasted three centuries, the period of the colonizations.
 From the foundation of Asuncion in 1537, Paraguay has been able to maintain most of its identity and its own peculiarities.
 And all the world knows that Argentina has one of the best polo teams and players in the world.
 In December, at the polo fields of Las Cañitas,
 You can watch minor tournaments and matches at other times of the year as well.
 For information on tournaments and tickets for polo games, please contact the Asociacion Argentina de Polo.
 The Falkland Islands have their own official currency, the Falkland Islands pound, which is equivalent in value to the British pound sterling.
 The only bank in the Islands, located in Stanley opposite the FIC West shop, offers currency exchange.
 The British pound is generally accepted everywhere on the Islands, and at Stanley you can often pay with credit cards and U S . dollars.
 It is likely that the smaller Islands will not accept credit cards, although British and U S . currency may be accepted.
 It is almost impossible to change money outside the Falklands, so change it before you leave.
 Since Montevideo is south of the equator, it is summer when in the northern hemisphere it is winter and vice versa.
 Montevideo is located in the subtropical region, and during the summer months, temperatures above thirty degrees Celsius are quite normal.
 The winters can be deceptively cold, rarely falling below zero, but the combination of wind and humidity gives the impression of a temperature lower than that indicated by the thermometer.
 There are no defined dry and rainy seasons here,
 Even though many of the park's animals are accustomed to the sight of man, the wildlife is still wild and should not be fed or disturbed.
 The park authorities recommend that you keep at least 100 yards from bears and wolves and at least 25 yards from all other wild animals.
 No matter how docile they may seem, bison, elk, deer, bears, practically all large animals can attack.
 Every year, dozens of visitors are injured because they do not keep a proper distance from these large, wild and potentially dangerous animals.
 And please be aware that odors can attract bears and other wildlife, so avoid bringing or cooking foods with very strong odors,
 Apia is the capital of the Samoan Islands, located on the island of Upolu, with a population of just under 40,000.
 Apia was founded between 1850 and 1860 and is the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 In this port, the so-called the stalemate of eighteen eighty nine,
 All but one of the ships were sunk,
 In the course of the Mau movement, a peaceful rally in the town led to the killing of Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III, the Supreme chief.
 There are many beaches, as Auckland is located between two harbors, and the most popular are divided into three areas.
 The beaches of the North Shore facing the Pacific ocean stretch from Long Bay in the North to Devonport in the South.
 These are mostly sandy beaches, safe for swimming, and most of them enjoy the shade of the pohutukawa trees.
 The beaches of Tamaki drive in Auckland's central business district, in the elegant suburbs of mission Bay and St Heliers,
 These are family beaches, sometimes a little crowded, surrounded by a wide choice of shops, where you can safely swim.
 The most well-known local beer is a simple, refreshing and easy-drinking beer called number one.
 You can have many French wines, but Australian and New Zealand wines could fare better.
 The water from the tap is totally safe to drink, but if you're worried, bottled water is easy to find.
 According to Australians, the flat white came from a foreign idea.
 The hot chocolate is at the same level as the Belgian one,
 Throughout the year, there are many dives on the reef, and injuries from diving on the reef are rare.
 Ask for advice from the authorities, follow the instructions and pay particular attention to the safety notices.
 Cubomedusae are found from October to April near the beaches and estuaries of the rivers north of Seventeen Seventy.
 Sharks are present, but rarely attack humans . Most sharks are afraid of humans and tend to keep their distance.
 The habitat of the saltwater crocodile is mainly the estuaries of the rivers north of Rockhampton, and they do not live actively in the ocean.
 By booking in advance, the traveler has the serenity of finding a place to sleep once he or she arrives at the destination.
 Travel agencies often have arrangements with certain hotels, but it is also possible to book other forms of accommodation, such as camping, through the same agencies.
 Travel agencies generally offer packages that include breakfast, transfers to and from the airport, or even a combination of flight and hotel.
 They can also hold the reservation for you if you need time to think about the offer or to get additional documents for your destination,
 However, any changes or requests must be made beforehand to the travel agent and not directly to the hotel.
 In the case of some music festivals, the majority of participants decide to camp on the site, considering this aspect a crucial element of the experience.
 To be close to the action, you have to arrive early and secure a space near the music.
 And the music will continue to play on the main stages until late at night.
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with small children.
 If you are crossing the Baltic Sea in winter, check the location of your cabin, as the crossing of the ice causes rather fastidious noises to those who are more exposed.
 The cruises to St . Petersburg include the time to be dedicated to the exploration of the city.
 Casinos generally do everything they can to increase the time and money spent by their guests,
 They usually offer food, drinks and exclusive entertainment to keep the mood of the guests up,
 In some places, however, the drinks are free, and the state of intoxication alters the judgment and every good gambler knows how important it is to remain sober.
 Anyone who decides to drive at high altitudes or on mountain passes must take into consideration the possibility of snow, ice or temperatures close to zero.
 On icy roads, the friction is reduced and it is not possible to drive as when one is on a clean asphalt.
 During a blizzard, in a very short time, so much snow can fall that you may be blocked in.
 Also, precipitation and windshield ice or condensation can reduce visibility.
 However, ice and snow are normal conditions in many countries, and traffic continues to flow almost uninterruptedly throughout the year.
 Safaris are probably the most popular tourist attraction in Africa and the focus of many visitors' holidays.
 In its popular use, the term safari refers to overland journeys, particularly in the savannah, to see the beautiful wildlife of Africa.
 Some animals, such as elephants and giraffes, tend to come closer to the car, so a normal camera is sufficient to get a good view.
 Lions, cheetahs and Leopards are sometimes shy and for this reason it is easier to observe them with a pair of binoculars.
 A walking safari is a safari that may last from a few hours to several days.
 The Paralympics will be held from August 24 to September 5, 2012, and some of the events will be held in other locations throughout Japan.
 Tokyo will be the only Asian city to have hosted two Olympic games, the first one having been held in 1964.
 If your booking for flights and accommodation for 2020 was made before the postponement was announced, you may find yourself in a difficult situation.
 The policies vary, but most of the cancellation policies related to the Coronavirus at the end of March,
 The cost of most of the tickets for the events is expected to be between 2,500 yuan and 130,000 yuan, while the regular tickets will cost around 7,000 yuan.
 Ironing umbrella's can be done in the hotel's laundry room, although they are not provided in the room.
 If you don't have an iron, or if you don't like wearing ironed socks, you can try with a hair dryer, if you have one.
 To avoid overheating, be sure to avoid temperatures that are too high,
 There are various ways to sanitize water, and some of these ways are more effective against specific risks.
 In some places it is sufficient to boil the water for a minute, in other places it takes many minutes.
 The effectiveness of the filters is variable, for this reason in case of doubts it is opportune to evaluate the purchase of water packed in bottles sealed by a reliable company.
 Travellers may come into contact with animal parasites that are not found in their own regions.
 Parasites can spoil food, cause irritation, or, in the worst case, cause allergic reactions or transmit toxins or infections.
 The same infectious diseases and dangerous animals that can hurt or kill people with their strength are not usually classified as being dangerous.
 Duty-Free shopping is an opportunity to buy tax-free products in certain locations.
 Travellers to countries with high taxes can sometimes save a lot, especially on things like alcohol and tobacco.
 The Buffalo-Pittsburgh section of the highway between Point Marion and Fairmont is the most difficult to drive,
 If you are not used to driving on country roads, it is advisable to keep your eyes wide open, as there are steep gradients, narrow lanes and sharp curves.
 The speed limit signs are posted at the beginning of the road, and the speed limit is 56 to 64 km per hour.
 Strangely, however, in this area the level of mobile phone coverage is much higher than in other parts of the route, for example, in the Pennsylvania Wilds.
 German desserts are quite good, and in Bavaria they are quite tasty and varied, similar to those of the neighboring Austria to the South.
 Fruit tarts are a timeless classic, from apples all year round to peaches and plums that make their appearance during the summer.
 Several German baked goods also contain almonds, hazelnuts and other nuts.
 Those who wish to taste small but richly flavored sweets may be guided to those which, according to the region, are called Berliner, Pfannkuchen, or Krapfen.
 Curry is a dish prepared with herbs and spices combined with meat or vegetables.
 The curry may be either dry or wet, depending on the amount of liquid it contains.
 In northern India and Pakistan, for curry in the interior regions, yogurt is normally used,
 Given the presence of 17,000 Islands to choose from, the term Indonesian cuisine is a general term that covers a wide variety of regional cuisines found in the country.
 However, when used without further specification, the term generally indicates foods originating from the central and eastern part of the main island, Java.
 The cuisine of Java, now widely diffused throughout the archipelago, offers a series of dishes of simple preparation,
 The stirrups are foot rests for the rider and are found on either side of the saddle.
 They guarantee greater stability to the rider but may present safety problems due to the possibility that the rider's feet may become jammed.
 If a jockey is thrown from a horse but has a foot caught in the stirrup, he could be dragged along by the horse as it runs away.
 First of all, most of the riders wear riding boots with a heel and a sole that is quite thin and quite flat.
 Some saddles, especially the English, have since added safety bars, which cause a leather strap to break away from the saddle when the rider pulls it back in a fall.
 Cochamó Valley, the most important climbing destination in Chile, known as the Yosemite of South America,
 The peaks of the mountains include breathtaking views, and climbers from all over the world are continually tracing new routes on its walls, potentially endless.
 The sports on snow in downhill, such as skiing and snowboarding, are very popular and involve sliding on snow with the aid of skis or a snowboard attached to the feet.
 Skiing is one of the main tourist activities and boasts many enthusiasts, sometimes even called ski bums,
 The principle behind skiing is a very old one, the first cave paintings of humans skiing date back to 5000 BC.
 Skiing as a sport originated at least in the seventeenth century, and in eighteen sixty one the first recreational ski club was opened in Australia by the Norwegians.
 The activity is also called off-piste, ski mountaineering or ski touring.
 It is linked, although usually not comprised of, to ski touring or Skimo, which are practiced on steep and rugged terrain and require much stiffer skis and boots.
 Think of the ski slope as a hiking trail.
 If the conditions are good, you can cover distances that are somewhat greater than walking, but only very rarely will you reach the speeds of cross-country skiing without a heavy pack on a beaten trail.
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but made up of many independent countries,
 However, in this respect, Schengen space functions more as a single country.
 If you stay within this area, you can usually go from one border to the other without having to go through passport control again.
 At the same time, if one is in possession of a Schengen visa, it is not necessary to apply for visas to the individual Member States, thus saving time, money and bureaucracy.
 There is no universal definition of what makes an item an antique,
 The definition presents geographical differences, and the age limit can be lower, as in the case of North America compared to Europe.
 Craftsman-Made items could be defined as antiques, even though they are more recent than similar mass-produced items.
 Reindeer herding is an important source of livelihood for the Sámi, and the culture around this herding is also the basis for many other professions.
 Even in the course of time, not all Sámi were involved in large-scale reindeer herding,
 Today, many Sámi people have modern professions, and tourism is an important source of income in Sápmi, the Sámi homeland.
 Even though it is very much used, particularly among non Roma people, the word Gypsy is often considered offensive because it is associated with negative stereotypes and a misperception of Roma people.
 If a warning to travellers were to be issued for the destination you are going to, there could be consequences for your travel insurance or your cancellation insurance.
 You may also be interested in the views of other governments, but keep in mind that these views are aimed at the citizens of those governments.
 For example, American citizens in the Middle East might encounter different situations than Europeans or Arabs.
 The news bulletins are simply a brief summary of the political situation in a country.
 The opinions reported are often superficial, general, and simplistic compared to the more detailed information available elsewhere.
 Weather conditions are the general term for any dangerous weather phenomenon that can cause damage, serious social disruption or loss of life.
 There are different types of weather, depending on the geography, the topography, and the atmospheric conditions.
 Strong winds, hail, above-average rainfall and uncontrolled fires are manifestations and consequences of adverse meteorological conditions, such as thunderstorms, tornadoes, waterspouts and cyclones.
 Among the most severe weather phenomena are tornadoes, blizzards, ice storms, and dust storms.
 We recommend that travelers check the weather conditions that may affect their area, as they may affect the planning of their trip.
 Anyone planning to visit a country that is potentially considered a war zone,
 By searching on the Internet for a course on hostile environments, you're likely to find the address of a local company.
 A course will normally cover all the topics discussed in much greater detail, usually by way of practical experience.
 A course lasts from two to five days and includes role-playing, as well as many first aid and sometimes weapons training.
 Books and magazines dealing with survival in the wild are plentiful, while books dealing with war zones are few.
 Travellers who are planning to have a sex change operation overseas must ensure they have the right documents for their return journey.
 The intention of governments to issue passports without indication of sex,
 And other countries have varying degrees of willingness to accept them.
 Even the inspections at security controls have become much more scrupulous in the post 11 September 2001 era.
 Transgender people in the pre-operative phase should not expect to pass through the controls without their privacy and dignity being violated.
 The tidal currents are constituted by the return flow of the waves that break on the shore, often near a coral reef or similar formation.
 And because of the topography of the seafloor,
 The majority of deaths occur as a result of exhaustion in the attempt to swim against the current, which can be impossible.
 As soon as you are out of the current, it will be easier to swim than it was before.
 You can also try to find a place where you are not likely to be trapped again, or consider waiting for help, based on your skills and whether you have been spotted.
 The shock from the return home is shorter than the shock from the culture shock,
 Travellers who have found it easy to adapt to the new culture sometimes have difficulty in returning to their own country.
 When you return home after living abroad, you will have adapted to the new culture and lost some of the ways of your home culture.
 In the first experience abroad, it's likely to have encountered people patient and understanding, aware that travelers in a new country have to adapt.
 Many people did not imagine that patience and awareness were also necessary for those who return home.
 The show of lights and sounds at the pyramid is one of the most interesting things for children in the area.
 Before the show begins, you will be able to admire the pyramids in the darkness and silence.
 You can always hear the noise of tourists and vendors, and the show of lights and sounds is like a book of stories.
 The Sphinx becomes the backdrop and narrator of a long tale.
 The scenes are projected onto the pyramids, and each pyramid is illuminated.
 The Shetland Islands, discovered in eighteen nineteen,
 The archipelago is located 120 km north of the peninsula, and the largest island, King George, is the site of the town of Villa Las Estrellas.
 Among the other Islands are Livingstone Island and Deception Island, the latter of which is the site of a still active volcano.
 The land of Ellsworth is the region that lies to the South of the peninsula and overlooks the sea of Bellingshausen.
 Here the mountains of the peninsula merge into the high plateau,
 The northern part, known as the Sentinel range, has the highest mountains of Antarctica, the Vinson massif, which reaches a height of 4,892 m with Mount Vinson.
 In remote areas, where there is no cellular coverage, a satellite phone may be the only possible alternative.
 A satellite phone is not generally a substitute for a cell phone because you have to be outdoors with a clear view to the satellite.
 The service is often used by pleasure boats, including those for pleasure, as well as by missions that have a need for data and voice at a distance.
 Your local telephone service provider should be able to give you more information about the connection to this service.
 One of the most popular options for those who are planning to take a gap year is to travel and learn.
 It's particularly common among new graduates, because they can take a year off before starting university without compromising their education.
 In many cases, enrolling in a course abroad during the sabbatical year can actually increase the chances of returning to higher education back home.
 Usually the payment of a fee is required for admission to these educational programs.
 Finland is the ideal destination for those who love to sail. In the land of a thousand lakes, there are also thousands of islands, both in the lakes and in the archipelagoes.
 It is not necessary to have a yacht for the archipelagoes and the lakes.
 Even though the coastal archipelagos and the larger lakes are certainly large enough for any yacht, the smaller boats or even a kayak offer a different experience.
 Boating is the national sport of Finland, where there is one boat for every seven or eight persons.
 This is also the case in Norway, Sweden and New Zealand, but is generally a rare occurrence.
 A lot of the different Baltic cruises include a longer stay in St . Petersburg, Russia.
 You can spend two whole days in the historic town, returning to the ship in the evening to sleep.
 For the disembarkation, no separate visa will be required for the shore excursions starting in 2009.
 Some brochures also offer cruises to Berlin, Germany, as you can see from the map above, Berlin is not near the sea, and the visit to the city is not included in the price of the cruise.
 Flying in an airplane can be scary for people of all ages and conditions, especially if they've never flown before or have had some sort of traumatic experience.
 There is nothing to be ashamed of it is not unlike the fears and aversions that many people have for other things.
 For some people, understanding a bit about how planes work and what happens during a flight can be helpful in overcoming a fear based on the unknown or a lack of control.
 The couriers are well paid to deliver products quickly,
 For some routes, the larger companies used their own planes, but for other routes and for smaller companies, there were problems.
 On some routes, air shipments would have taken days for unloading and customs.
 The only way to get it there faster would be to ship it as baggage, and that's where you come in, since airline regulations don't allow baggage to be shipped without a passenger.
 To fly first or business class, the obvious way is to pay a lot of money for the privilege,
 However, the price to pay is high: you can expect to pay up to four times the normal economy fare and up to eleven times the normal first class fare.
 In general, on flights from A to B, it's not even worth looking for first or business class deals.
 Airlines know that there is a category of travelers who are willing to pay a lot of money for the privilege of arriving quickly and comfortably at their destination,
 The capital of Moldova is Chişinău, and the local language is Romanian, although Russian is also very common.
 Moldova is a Multi-Ethnic Republic that has been the scene of an ethnic conflict in the past.
 In one thousand nine hundred and ninety four, the conflict led to the creation of the self-proclaimed Transnistria Republic in the eastern part of Moldova, with its own government and currency, but not recognized by any country member of the UN.
 Despite the failure of the political negotiations, the economic relations between these two parts of Moldova have been restored.
 The predominant religion in Moldova is the Christian Orthodox religion.
 Smirna is the third largest city in Turkey, with a population of about 3.7 million people,
 The ancient city of Smyrna is built on a large Bay, is surrounded by mountains, and is now a modern, developed, and active commercial center.
 Although the city has a more Mediterranean atmosphere than that of traditional Turkey, wide avenues, glass facades and modern shopping centers are dotted with the characteristic red tiles, the eighteenth century market, and ancient mosques and churches.
 In the village of Haldarsvik you can enjoy beautiful views of the nearby Island of Eysturoy and you can visit a unique octagonal church.
 In the churchyard, on some of the tombs, are interesting marble sculptures of doves.
 A half hour is enough to walk around the charming village.
 To the north is the romantic and enchanting city of Sintra, easily reached.
 The bus line Scotturb 403 regularly connects with Sintra, and stops at Cabo da Roca.
 And to the North, visit the great shrine of the Virgin of Fatima, a place of Marian apparitions celebrated all over the world.
 Remember that the site you are visiting is basically a mass grave, and it has a significance that is almost incalculable to a large part of the world's population.
 There are still many men and women who survived these places, and many others who have seen their own relatives murdered or made to work until they died,
 Treat the place with all the dignity, seriousness, and respect it deserves.
 Avoid defacing these places by graffiti or markings.
 In the city of Barcelona, the official languages are Catalan and Spanish, with about half the population preferring to speak Catalan,
 But the majority of the signs are written in Catalan, which is the first official language,
 The Spanish, however, is widely used for public transport and other services.
 In the Metro, the regular announcements are only in Catalan, and any unscheduled interruptions are communicated in a wide variety of languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic, and Japanese, thanks to an automated system.
 Parisians are said to be egocentric, rude and arrogant.
 Even if it is only a stereotype, the best way to feel at home in Paris is to behave as a well-bred person would,
 The rough exterior of the Parisians will vanish quickly if you show them some basic good manners.
 The Plitvice Lakes National Park is rich in forests, mostly beech, fir and spruce,
 Thanks to a multiplicity of microclimates, soils and levels of altitude, it has a great variety of plant communities.
 The area is also home to a wide variety of animal and bird species.
 In these places live rare species such as the European Brown bear, the Wolf, the Eagle, the Owl, the lynx, the wild cat and the Gallic grouse,
 When visiting monasteries, women are required to wear skirts that cover their knees and to cover their shoulders.
 Most monasteries will lend you a stole for women who come unprepared, but if you have one, especially if it is a bright color, you will earn a smile from the monk or nun at the entrance.
 In a similar way, men are required to wear long pants down to the ankles.
 These can also be borrowed from the warehouse at the entrance, but the clothes are not washed after each user, so you may not feel comfortable wearing these skirts.
 The cuisine of the Balearic Islands, like that of the Mediterranean, is based on bread, vegetables and meat,
 The Pa amb Oli is a popular, simple, summer season meal,
 All nouns, in addition to the pronoun Sie, which is used for the formal you,
 This represents an important mechanism for distinguishing certain verbs and complements.
 This aspect probably also facilitates reading, although the need to understand whether a verb or an adjective is used in a substantivated form makes the writing rather complex.
 The Italian language is relatively simple to learn,
 The main letters to pay attention to are the C and the G, since their pronunciation changes based on the vowel that follows them.
 And make sure you pronounce the R's and the L's differently . caro means dear, and carro means carriage.
 The Persian language is a relatively simple and most of the time, regular, language.
 So, reading this basic grammar book could help you a lot with Persian grammar and understanding Persian sentences.
 It goes without saying that if you already know a Romance language, learning Portuguese will be easier.
 However, people with a minimal knowledge of Spanish may come to the precipitous conclusion that Portuguese is quite similar and therefore need not be studied separately.
 Usually, the pre-modern observers are obsolete and serve as museums or educational places.
 Since light pollution was not a problem in their heyday,
 Most of the modern telescopes that are used for research are huge structures in remote locations where the atmospheric conditions are favorable.
 The admiration of the cherry blossom, known as Hanami, has been a part of Japanese culture since the eighth century.
 The concept originated in China, where the blossoming of the plum trees was preferred.
 In Japan, the first plum blossom festivals were organized by the emperor for himself and other members of the aristocracy close to the Imperial court.
 Plants give their best when they are in their natural environment, so resist the temptation to take even just one plant.
 If you visit an Italian garden, even picking up a few plants will cost you an escort from the garden.
 In general, Singapore is a very safe and easy city to get around in, and you can buy pretty much anything once you're there.
 But being in the high tropics, only a few degrees north of the equator, you will have to reckon with the heat and the strong sunshine.
 Some buses also go to the North, to Hebron, the traditional place where the Biblical patriarchs Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob,
 Make sure the bus you want to take goes to the Hebron city center and not to the nearby Jewish settlement of Kiryat Arba.
 The inland waterways can be a great theme around which to organize a vacation.
 For example, you can visit the castles in the Loire Valley and the Rhine Valley, you can take a cruise to visit the interesting cities on the Danube,
 They also define the hiking and biking trails that are so well known.
 The Christmas holiday is one of the most important holidays in Christianity and celebrates the birth of Jesus.
 And many of the traditions are still practiced by people of all faiths and backgrounds in the Christian world and beyond.
 A tradition is to spend the night of Easter Sunday awake in an open place to see the dawn.
 There are, of course, theological explanations for this tradition, but it could just as well be a pre-Christian fertility rite.
 In the more traditional churches, a Paschal vigil is often held on the Saturday night of the Easter weekend, with congregations often beginning the ceremony at midnight to celebrate the resurrection of Christ.
 All the animals that originally arrived on the Islands arrived by swimming, flying, or floating.
 Because the distance from the mainland was considerable, the mammals were unable to make the journey,
 And the Galapagos were introduced to numerous mammals such as goats, horses, cows, rats, dogs, and cats after the arrival of man.
 If you visit the Arctic or Antarctic during the winter, you will experience the polar night,
 This phenomenon offers the possibility of witnessing the Aurora Borealis, because the sky remains dark almost all day.
 The skies are so clear that you can see the stars at night.
 In Japan, the culture of work is more Hierarchical and formal than what Westerners tend to be accustomed to.
 The dress code for the office is usually a suit and tie or a tuxedo, and one addresses colleagues by their last name or title.
 The importance of the workplace is crucial, because it gives importance to the group's effort rather than to individual achievements.
 Workers must often receive the approval of their superiors in regard to every decision, and are expected to follow instructions without question.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.2472933594451651, 'precisions': [0.6026033690658499, 0.33836715431807457, 0.21171573000297353, 0.13638735260356882], 'brevity_penalty': 0.8927414702633779, 'length_ratio': 0.8981028275555196, 'translation_length': 22202, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 51.35992849200348, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2} results comet:{'mean_score': 0.8150455332674057, 'scores': [0.778898298740387, 0.8267422318458557, 0.9016150832176208, 0.6012474298477173, 0.647707998752594, 0.7722601890563965, 0.8623366951942444, 0.7751971483230591, 0.8682780861854553, 0.775139331817627, 0.6873409748077393, 0.8817189931869507, 0.899020254611969, 0.47591251134872437, 0.8363818526268005, 0.7508842349052429, 0.5714841485023499, 0.8194352388381958, 0.6795563697814941, 0.41691938042640686, 0.8951219916343689, 0.7378068566322327, 0.8184874653816223, 0.796681821346283, 0.5631646513938904, 0.9218815565109253, 0.7672740817070007, 0.8336624503135681, 0.8598111271858215, 0.8713642954826355, 0.7034301161766052, 0.6328900456428528, 0.5943847298622131, 0.8821156024932861, 0.9372561573982239, 0.9004603028297424, 0.8845370411872864, 0.8288871645927429, 0.8423895835876465, 0.9341729283332825, 0.9017639756202698, 0.9125745892524719, 0.9235081672668457, 0.9028579592704773, 0.8254381418228149, 0.7655336856842041, 0.889254093170166, 0.8663169741630554, 0.9210790395736694, 0.8179413080215454, 0.8528025150299072, 0.7644494771957397, 0.8967087268829346, 0.9147963523864746, 0.6769145727157593, 0.8766507506370544, 0.8444072604179382, 0.8697490096092224, 0.9202118515968323, 0.9308512806892395, 0.8920379281044006, 0.9086080193519592, 0.8450762629508972, 0.7771654725074768, 0.8761683702468872, 0.876166582107544, 0.8732098937034607, 0.8410394787788391, 0.6014086604118347, 0.8343468308448792, 0.892754077911377, 0.8397423624992371, 0.8253710865974426, 0.8508328199386597, 0.6528794765472412, 0.8189342617988586, 0.8864113688468933, 0.8448023796081543, 0.925162136554718, 0.8630151152610779, 0.7820313572883606, 0.8799875378608704, 0.4307703673839569, 0.7359885573387146, 0.8660383224487305, 0.8546662330627441, 0.5559840798377991, 0.8824453949928284, 0.8885980248451233, 0.861695408821106, 0.754353404045105, 0.8675629496574402, 0.8818184733390808, 0.9234184622764587, 0.9206704497337341, 0.9315275549888611, 0.8109358549118042, 0.604326605796814, 0.812920331954956, 0.8718908429145813, 0.889793872833252, 0.7914751172065735, 0.8402960300445557, 0.9066391587257385, 0.8824098706245422, 0.7641394734382629, 0.8210386633872986, 0.8788791298866272, 0.6188830733299255, 0.6566362380981445, 0.8810596466064453, 0.9234177470207214, 0.9167366623878479, 0.9151850342750549, 0.7518715262413025, 0.7540093660354614, 0.8825761079788208, 0.7933298349380493, 0.923585832118988, 0.8182318806648254, 0.5831071138381958, 0.8392714858055115, 0.8810504078865051, 0.8086702227592468, 0.9093295931816101, 0.652057945728302, 0.8789771199226379, 0.9035521149635315, 0.9141983389854431, 0.9155750274658203, 0.9052405953407288, 0.8639511466026306, 0.8811936974525452, 0.8911315202713013, 0.4338553547859192, 0.8780233860015869, 0.8683175444602966, 0.8907896876335144, 0.9280360341072083, 0.8363490104675293, 0.9033945202827454, 0.7615620493888855, 0.9296396374702454, 0.8230158686637878, 0.7543395757675171, 0.8655270338058472, 0.6251417398452759, 0.8892278075218201, 0.7688430547714233, 0.8931910395622253, 0.8732057213783264, 0.675456702709198, 0.6891325116157532, 0.8065769672393799, 0.8658167719841003, 0.8538047075271606, 0.886020302772522, 0.857818603515625, 0.8515458703041077, 0.8643767237663269, 0.9043927788734436, 0.6593627333641052, 0.6918413043022156, 0.8705505728721619, 0.8839151263237, 0.7098231911659241, 0.8599551916122437, 0.8701174855232239, 0.8716791868209839, 0.4962088167667389, 0.8410983681678772, 0.8932652473449707, 0.8704853653907776, 0.7800915837287903, 0.8740288615226746, 0.8679858446121216, 0.8007881045341492, 0.8636501431465149, 0.8812336325645447, 0.7466713190078735, 0.8700477480888367, 0.8938137888908386, 0.9090303778648376, 0.8813575506210327, 0.8055729866027832, 0.9172581434249878, 0.6704699397087097, 0.8688144087791443, 0.7615395784378052, 0.5971980690956116, 0.7961781024932861, 0.6598849296569824, 0.8386749625205994, 0.7985808253288269, 0.8900874257087708, 0.9097362756729126, 0.6665632724761963, 0.7169349193572998, 0.8881699442863464, 0.9007367491722107, 0.7660346627235413, 0.7775154113769531, 0.7937023639678955, 0.754421055316925, 0.7231468558311462, 0.8659103512763977, 0.8418818712234497, 0.8563165068626404, 0.9097675681114197, 0.8643538355827332, 0.9353217482566833, 0.909437358379364, 0.9275275468826294, 0.8114542961120605, 0.45116719603538513, 0.8860453963279724, 0.8698686957359314, 0.8665216565132141, 0.8484005928039551, 0.8742769956588745, 0.9499370455741882, 0.8559210300445557, 0.8974327445030212, 0.7115626931190491, 0.8541730046272278, 0.7649686932563782, 0.8915992379188538, 0.8333964943885803, 0.8857764601707458, 0.855911135673523, 0.8003634810447693, 0.8979254364967346, 0.7327037453651428, 0.9202980399131775, 0.7323322296142578, 0.8871265053749084, 0.8745049834251404, 0.8275503516197205, 0.9326010346412659, 0.8931132555007935, 0.8167250156402588, 0.760891318321228, 0.723179042339325, 0.7231089472770691, 0.8995816707611084, 0.9213639497756958, 0.813092052936554, 0.5727329254150391, 0.7442770004272461, 0.8161631226539612, 0.8856915831565857, 0.9136363863945007, 0.9185431003570557, 0.884574830532074, 0.9155246615409851, 0.9035201668739319, 0.7182477712631226, 0.8911979794502258, 0.8901846408843994, 0.8684646487236023, 0.8861526846885681, 0.8196824193000793, 0.888741672039032, 0.8871243000030518, 0.9201380014419556, 0.7694581747055054, 0.4774916470050812, 0.8032345771789551, 0.8985291719436646, 0.6690444350242615, 0.8567348718643188, 0.7498353123664856, 0.8557532429695129, 0.7035921216011047, 0.5943595170974731, 0.5828664302825928, 0.6798881888389587, 0.9051111340522766, 0.4838917851448059, 0.9442207217216492, 0.9085286855697632, 0.8060581684112549, 0.8614793419837952, 0.8352448344230652, 0.9157368540763855, 0.933712363243103, 0.8151420950889587, 0.8104665279388428, 0.7603455185890198, 0.4911486804485321, 0.8706189393997192, 0.8511826395988464, 0.871525228023529, 0.884156346321106, 0.6292957663536072, 0.7406417727470398, 0.5818591713905334, 0.7887601852416992, 0.6889926791191101, 0.8614878058433533, 0.8983849883079529, 0.8771792650222778, 0.866597592830658, 0.8858224749565125, 0.6948404312133789, 0.7614144682884216, 0.7288329601287842, 0.8250276446342468, 0.8728652000427246, 0.8041099309921265, 0.8875057101249695, 0.8884219527244568, 0.9087877869606018, 0.7115175127983093, 0.8855999112129211, 0.852313220500946, 0.8875621557235718, 0.8699805736541748, 0.8827141523361206, 0.8765117526054382, 0.6596860289573669, 0.5190860033035278, 0.4542491137981415, 0.8482956290245056, 0.614936113357544, 0.7571397423744202, 0.7198564410209656, 0.8482432961463928, 0.6874184608459473, 0.8508679866790771, 0.8637990951538086, 0.8882165551185608, 0.9134307503700256, 0.8621821403503418, 0.9314783811569214, 0.8602803349494934, 0.6763094067573547, 0.7830108404159546, 0.8454097509384155, 0.8777327537536621, 0.5860985517501831, 0.6187594532966614, 0.7896145582199097, 0.863069474697113, 0.8374860882759094, 0.8561655879020691, 0.8792051672935486, 0.7491510510444641, 0.8873236179351807, 0.6015667915344238, 0.8669717907905579, 0.859964907169342, 0.7500065565109253, 0.925970196723938, 0.8957624435424805, 0.8633113503456116, 0.883861243724823, 0.851353108882904, 0.8232827186584473, 0.8484415411949158, 0.8311425447463989, 0.8708189725875854, 0.9150847792625427, 0.5754601955413818, 0.9407948851585388, 0.6203022599220276, 0.8093157410621643, 0.723288357257843, 0.8168171048164368, 0.7955684065818787, 0.7705020308494568, 0.6417038440704346, 0.598374605178833, 0.8648254871368408, 0.9297914505004883, 0.8921452760696411, 0.8998032808303833, 0.8343193531036377, 0.8424428701400757, 0.7985699772834778, 0.884347677230835, 0.8849146366119385, 0.4556417167186737, 0.8751453757286072, 0.8457544445991516, 0.8523638844490051, 0.8037357330322266, 0.6172779202461243, 0.9013177752494812, 0.8841372132301331, 0.9206438660621643, 0.8882076144218445, 0.796368420124054, 0.9245190620422363, 0.5073550343513489, 0.8593769073486328, 0.7389909029006958, 0.953589141368866, 0.7650482058525085, 0.9107384085655212, 0.8894100189208984, 0.7995374798774719, 0.9167102575302124, 0.6045937538146973, 0.7701262831687927, 0.5711911916732788, 0.8916332721710205, 0.874505877494812, 0.5651975274085999, 0.8146442770957947, 0.8680854439735413, 0.7084675431251526, 0.5325272679328918, 0.7667096853256226, 0.7818949222564697, 0.7633680701255798, 0.9061782956123352, 0.6763184666633606, 0.8531025648117065, 0.8906609416007996, 0.8633195161819458, 0.8397925496101379, 0.7578160166740417, 0.8188555836677551, 0.4418005645275116, 0.8393326997756958, 0.5583717823028564, 0.87128084897995, 0.8871576189994812, 0.7099449038505554, 0.8876264095306396, 0.8554019331932068, 0.6256741285324097, 0.7573315501213074, 0.470563679933548, 0.8542566895484924, 0.8651793599128723, 0.8097813725471497, 0.8825414776802063, 0.8881920576095581, 0.8995264172554016, 0.9020833969116211, 0.9189542531967163, 0.6874439120292664, 0.8886836171150208, 0.8937197923660278, 0.8930891752243042, 0.9207156300544739, 0.6361145377159119, 0.7848595976829529, 0.7557632327079773, 0.7254152894020081, 0.8277199864387512, 0.736373782157898, 0.8688082098960876, 0.82956463098526, 0.8340287804603577, 0.8895387053489685, 0.6161231398582458, 0.8652099967002869, 0.9193892478942871, 0.6957499384880066, 0.6530821919441223, 0.8434038758277893, 0.45725759863853455, 0.7177650332450867, 0.8894397616386414, 0.5858656764030457, 0.7791656255722046, 0.749586284160614, 0.8149821162223816, 0.41701626777648926, 0.7771857380867004, 0.8579830527305603, 0.8034964799880981, 0.862686038017273, 0.8022021651268005, 0.8083911538124084, 0.9177640080451965, 0.7658795714378357, 0.8511704802513123, 0.6623764634132385, 0.7979692816734314, 0.8559228777885437, 0.905131995677948, 0.8681548237800598, 0.9016595482826233, 0.5709392428398132, 0.6257486939430237, 0.9016651511192322, 0.8702983260154724, 0.8512040972709656, 0.8564015030860901, 0.8979086875915527, 0.7771545052528381, 0.849311888217926, 0.8678706288337708, 0.7142751812934875, 0.9359132647514343, 0.864949643611908, 0.9187760353088379, 0.9100045561790466, 0.8431023359298706, 0.7734975218772888, 0.5927745699882507, 0.9400420784950256, 0.8240910768508911, 0.8857389688491821, 0.8648982644081116, 0.8953731656074524, 0.7211236357688904, 0.778867781162262, 0.7429323792457581, 0.8083210587501526, 0.8882583975791931, 0.9301995635032654, 0.7025224566459656, 0.9310539960861206, 0.874832808971405, 0.8169080018997192, 0.8212040066719055, 0.8843962550163269, 0.8347141146659851, 0.3408149182796478, 0.8774716854095459, 0.8505769371986389, 0.8726527094841003, 0.8414226770401001, 0.8673215508460999, 0.8762572407722473, 0.7782394289970398, 0.7212220430374146, 0.6951635479927063, 0.7605042457580566, 0.8518223762512207, 0.8330699801445007, 0.7770248055458069, 0.7574657797813416, 0.7564875483512878, 0.8776541352272034, 0.866360604763031, 0.9101597666740417, 0.8533803820610046, 0.6825413107872009, 0.6651937365531921, 0.8995256423950195, 0.6967411637306213, 0.8831084370613098, 0.6678900122642517, 0.9421680569648743, 0.8060946464538574, 0.7879067063331604, 0.6971408724784851, 0.8642925024032593, 0.897844135761261, 0.6634443402290344, 0.7551559805870056, 0.8828567862510681, 0.48768559098243713, 0.8173008561134338, 0.8818754553794861, 0.7210317850112915, 0.5369543433189392, 0.6051797866821289, 0.7615097761154175, 0.8126323819160461, 0.8385218977928162, 0.8933503031730652, 0.7060749530792236, 0.8001751899719238, 0.8473406434059143, 0.8381192684173584, 0.7189414501190186, 0.7039154171943665, 0.8644233345985413, 0.7683070302009583, 0.8729298710823059, 0.8614975810050964, 0.8873524069786072, 0.8976940512657166, 0.874187171459198, 0.9172938466072083, 0.8373677134513855, 0.8631435632705688, 0.8655913472175598, 0.4610864222049713, 0.8355119824409485, 0.8744129538536072, 0.8605087399482727, 0.6730541586875916, 0.9180183410644531, 0.9021932482719421, 0.7606266140937805, 0.9198836088180542, 0.7689544558525085, 0.8999695181846619, 0.8364644646644592, 0.6978421211242676, 0.8626452088356018, 0.8953117728233337, 0.5000520348548889, 0.8337430357933044, 0.8076537251472473, 0.7951213717460632, 0.8906447291374207, 0.9083174467086792, 0.8067483305931091, 0.8359394669532776, 0.7748204469680786, 0.8800601363182068, 0.88015216588974, 0.8816507458686829, 0.860489010810852, 0.8651074171066284, 0.8845110535621643, 0.7710878252983093, 0.7857757806777954, 0.9215651750564575, 0.9135536551475525, 0.8428683876991272, 0.8337947726249695, 0.7915028929710388, 0.9328123331069946, 0.6142364144325256, 0.6586889624595642, 0.8954271674156189, 0.8994439244270325, 0.6217378973960876, 0.5896590352058411, 0.8828396201133728, 0.8499222993850708, 0.8755814433097839, 0.8966336846351624, 0.9425544142723083, 0.953507661819458, 0.7768653035163879, 0.8911728262901306, 0.8104556202888489, 0.8835065960884094, 0.8832557201385498, 0.8523086309432983, 0.943040132522583, 0.8713824152946472, 0.8683003783226013, 0.8766675591468811, 0.6495981812477112, 0.8269878625869751, 0.8900617957115173, 0.5157732367515564, 0.8845658898353577, 0.9290274381637573, 0.8315066695213318, 0.8641637563705444, 0.8135827779769897, 0.8383445143699646, 0.9220502376556396, 0.8267173171043396, 0.8623433709144592, 0.6805602312088013, 0.8494802713394165, 0.8186626434326172, 0.879605770111084, 0.8882519602775574, 0.871250569820404, 0.9116645455360413, 0.7738984227180481, 0.6172892451286316, 0.7569321990013123, 0.8374897837638855, 0.7435289025306702, 0.9019495844841003, 0.9167534708976746, 0.7658905982971191, 0.7013963460922241, 0.8716989755630493, 0.8977908492088318, 0.9305810928344727, 0.9195127487182617, 0.8775338530540466, 0.9440915584564209, 0.8185948729515076, 0.778624951839447, 0.8778719305992126, 0.8745915293693542, 0.8779558539390564, 0.908519446849823, 0.504294216632843, 0.7830843329429626, 0.8522993326187134, 0.7025187611579895, 0.8710868954658508, 0.6960543990135193, 0.9070900082588196, 0.8529009819030762, 0.8475163578987122, 0.8828025460243225, 0.6178921461105347, 0.909020721912384, 0.8571776151657104, 0.6711544990539551, 0.7551830410957336, 0.7793807983398438, 0.8906518816947937, 0.7659489512443542, 0.674351155757904, 0.8993199467658997, 0.6117568612098694, 0.7631569504737854, 0.9048559069633484, 0.8916932940483093, 0.9286578893661499, 0.7502449154853821, 0.8921422362327576, 0.8038725256919861, 0.8734822273254395, 0.7544319033622742, 0.7245214581489563, 0.7398459911346436, 0.8235579133033752, 0.6653750538825989, 0.7005512118339539, 0.8424343466758728, 0.8112412095069885, 0.8971726894378662, 0.4545013904571533, 0.9288040995597839, 0.864327073097229, 0.8432597517967224, 0.7359013557434082, 0.8812782168388367, 0.8958790898323059, 0.8547787070274353, 0.8329748511314392, 0.8836632370948792, 0.8533234000205994, 0.9180392026901245, 0.8734259605407715, 0.728823721408844, 0.8976368308067322, 0.8827505707740784, 0.8556689023971558, 0.8128567337989807, 0.8389783501625061, 0.6002556681632996, 0.8999060988426208, 0.7376186847686768, 0.9011152386665344, 0.5349728465080261, 0.9091264605522156, 0.8802687525749207, 0.8836494088172913, 0.5501958727836609, 0.8454368710517883, 0.8900442719459534, 0.8325427174568176, 0.8712252378463745, 0.8342534303665161, 0.8109663128852844, 0.8303303122520447, 0.90721195936203, 0.9053977727890015, 0.9165831208229065, 0.8151529431343079, 0.9082961082458496, 0.8777080178260803, 0.908907949924469, 0.8853375315666199, 0.8449034094810486, 0.8930631279945374, 0.9331888556480408, 0.38171231746673584, 0.6798192262649536, 0.8272023797035217, 0.8901658058166504, 0.8556637167930603, 0.9053661227226257, 0.7588057518005371, 0.8573483228683472, 0.7505015730857849, 0.8015775084495544, 0.9039649367332458, 0.4358373284339905, 0.7567570805549622, 0.816676914691925, 0.8807621002197266, 0.6980305314064026, 0.8850696682929993, 0.8780306577682495, 0.884917140007019, 0.9103320240974426, 0.9134981036186218, 0.8528201580047607, 0.8913246393203735, 0.8918512463569641, 0.8424000144004822, 0.7515879273414612, 0.9667821526527405, 0.8227601647377014, 0.700036883354187, 0.6966087222099304, 0.8299300074577332, 0.8435670733451843, 0.9037825465202332, 0.8510181307792664, 0.8710383772850037, 0.8426303267478943, 0.9097971320152283, 0.9101161956787109, 0.8990761637687683, 0.8647979497909546, 0.8706501126289368, 0.6891388297080994, 0.900425136089325, 0.9255761504173279, 0.9110644459724426, 0.6249747276306152, 0.831763505935669, 0.6389134526252747, 0.8443875312805176, 0.639428436756134, 0.903380811214447, 0.890271782875061, 0.8141440749168396, 0.8601510524749756, 0.9263224601745605, 0.7109670042991638, 0.848400890827179, 0.8833604454994202, 0.7494446635246277, 0.8436743021011353, 0.6968960165977478, 0.8978038430213928, 0.8638107180595398, 0.7874711155891418, 0.7955370545387268, 0.8043696284294128, 0.8904692530632019, 0.8955757021903992, 0.7089434266090393, 0.8942380547523499, 0.9109949469566345, 0.6149182915687561, 0.8082836270332336, 0.8610201478004456, 0.7097975611686707, 0.8298484086990356, 0.826869547367096, 0.7654580473899841, 0.8280777931213379, 0.8354150652885437, 0.7535251379013062, 0.8644823431968689, 0.8145065307617188, 0.8047966361045837, 0.8165000081062317, 0.8211820721626282, 0.8519090414047241, 0.6008216142654419, 0.8844063878059387, 0.9011763334274292, 0.8589908480644226, 0.7298160195350647, 0.8757790923118591, 0.8856948018074036, 0.8765035271644592, 0.6541499495506287, 0.8750658631324768, 0.8767465949058533, 0.8101921677589417, 0.8319568037986755, 0.9374985098838806, 0.8209406733512878, 0.9260127544403076, 0.8934885859489441, 0.8559331893920898, 0.86692875623703, 0.886981725692749, 0.8110039830207825, 0.8409016728401184, 0.8281664252281189, 0.9180654883384705, 0.898927628993988, 0.9052532911300659, 0.8620863556861877, 0.6233049035072327, 0.7075448632240295, 0.8194778561592102, 0.8710300922393799, 0.8346312642097473, 0.5515913367271423, 0.8864174485206604, 0.8115795254707336, 0.835902988910675, 0.6544342041015625, 0.8665919303894043, 0.8898164629936218, 0.8378836512565613, 0.8142276406288147, 0.9206628203392029, 0.8607543706893921, 0.8465850949287415, 0.8960938453674316, 0.8796239495277405, 0.5077379941940308, 0.8823491930961609, 0.709637463092804, 0.7896127104759216, 0.6490045189857483, 0.8538621068000793, 0.9250630736351013, 0.8667386174201965, 0.8016563057899475, 0.9404298663139343, 0.9152106642723083, 0.8824002742767334, 0.8634591698646545, 0.8987772464752197, 0.8455643057823181, 0.8346133828163147, 0.9169196486473083, 0.8781494498252869, 0.7529538869857788, 0.90245121717453, 0.8572941422462463, 0.7378185391426086, 0.8826706409454346, 0.8950598835945129, 0.8429961800575256, 0.9083585739135742, 0.601715624332428, 0.9034237265586853, 0.8531614542007446, 0.8229766488075256, 0.7777842879295349, 0.8511013984680176, 0.8264196515083313, 0.8615132570266724, 0.9385462403297424, 0.8775538802146912, 0.8200095295906067, 0.9151962399482727, 0.9470831751823425, 0.787543773651123, 0.9006227850914001, 0.853023111820221, 0.8622750043869019, 0.9034599661827087, 0.8832803964614868, 0.7167385220527649, 0.9086657166481018, 0.8399845957756042, 0.8536277413368225, 0.7248678803443909, 0.78252774477005, 0.8241820931434631, 0.8620673418045044, 0.8439072370529175, 0.9138892292976379, 0.8651902079582214, 0.9382894039154053, 0.6554245352745056, 0.8578384518623352, 0.8043910264968872, 0.8888415694236755, 0.9588376879692078, 0.806369423866272, 0.8897837996482849, 0.790540337562561, 0.8524150252342224, 0.828793466091156, 0.7717207670211792, 0.6186949610710144, 0.5557305812835693, 0.8478931188583374, 0.8788167238235474, 0.6087716817855835, 0.8750953078269958, 0.7763966917991638, 0.8319631218910217, 0.8617570400238037, 0.8339335322380066, 0.8726704120635986, 0.8230658173561096, 0.6204445362091064, 0.9009955525398254, 0.8833884000778198, 0.8362014889717102, 0.8943601846694946, 0.8368108868598938, 0.5410893559455872, 0.9058851599693298, 0.8226978182792664, 0.7561843991279602, 0.8868440985679626, 0.9203889966011047, 0.8346213698387146, 0.8588118553161621, 0.933489203453064, 0.7680642008781433, 0.8192515969276428, 0.9023662805557251, 0.8419970870018005, 0.907613217830658, 0.6981844305992126, 0.8552315831184387, 0.7600372433662415, 0.7683696150779724, 0.5774410367012024, 0.9152773022651672, 0.8124371767044067, 0.7972709536552429, 0.8852104544639587]}